Illinois, session 104th, SB1504.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by changing Sections 5 and 35.10 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/5)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-1061)8    Sec. 5. Direct child welfare services; Department of 9Children and Family Services. To provide direct child welfare 10services when not available through other public or private 11child care or program facilities.12    (a) For purposes of this Section:13        (1) "Children" means persons found within the State 14    who are under the age of 18 years. The term also includes 15    persons under age 21 who:16            (A) were committed to the Department pursuant to 17        the Juvenile Court Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 18        1987 and who continue under the jurisdiction of the 19        court; or20            (B) were accepted for care, service and training 21        by the Department prior to the age of 18 and whose best 22        interest in the discretion of the Department would be 23        served by continuing that care, service and training   SB1504 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        because of severe emotional disturbances, physical 2        disability, social adjustment or any combination 3        thereof, or because of the need to complete an 4        educational or vocational training program.5        (2) "Homeless youth" means persons found within the 6    State who are under the age of 19, are not in a safe and 7    stable living situation and cannot be reunited with their 8    families.9        (3) "Child welfare services" means public social 10    services which are directed toward the accomplishment of 11    the following purposes:12            (A) protecting and promoting the health, safety 13        and welfare of children, including homeless, 14        dependent, or neglected children;15            (B) remedying, or assisting in the solution of 16        problems which may result in, the neglect, abuse, 17        exploitation, or delinquency of children;18            (C) preventing the unnecessary separation of 19        children from their families by identifying family 20        problems, assisting families in resolving their 21        problems, and preventing the breakup of the family 22        where the prevention of child removal is desirable and 23        possible when the child can be cared for at home 24        without endangering the child's health and safety;25            (D) restoring to their families children who have 26        been removed, by the provision of services to the   SB1504 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        child and the families when the child can be cared for 2        at home without endangering the child's health and 3        safety;4            (E) placing children in suitable permanent family 5        arrangements, through guardianship or adoption, in 6        cases where restoration to the birth family is not 7        safe, possible, or appropriate;8            (F) at the time of placement, conducting 9        concurrent planning, as described in subsection (l-1) 10        of this Section, so that permanency may occur at the 11        earliest opportunity. Consideration should be given so 12        that if reunification fails or is delayed, the 13        placement made is the best available placement to 14        provide permanency for the child;15            (G) (blank);16            (H) (blank); and17            (I) placing and maintaining children in facilities 18        that provide separate living quarters for children 19        under the age of 18 and for children 18 years of age 20        and older, unless a child 18 years of age is in the 21        last year of high school education or vocational 22        training, in an approved individual or group treatment 23        program, in a licensed shelter facility, or secure 24        child care facility. The Department is not required to 25        place or maintain children:26                (i) who are in a foster home, or  SB1504 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1                (ii) who are persons with a developmental 2            disability, as defined in the Mental Health and 3            Developmental Disabilities Code, or4                (iii) who are female children who are 5            pregnant, pregnant and parenting, or parenting, or6                (iv) who are siblings, in facilities that 7            provide separate living quarters for children 18 8            years of age and older and for children under 18 9            years of age.10    (b) (Blank).11    (b-5) The Department shall adopt rules to establish a 12process for all licensed residential providers in Illinois to 13submit data as required by the Department if they contract or 14receive reimbursement for children's mental health, substance 15use, and developmental disability services from the Department 16of Human Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 17Department of Healthcare and Family Services. The requested 18data must include, but is not limited to, capacity, staffing, 19and occupancy data for the purpose of establishing State need 20and placement availability. 21    All information collected, shared, or stored pursuant to 22this subsection shall be handled in accordance with all State 23and federal privacy laws and accompanying regulations and 24rules, including without limitation the federal Health 25Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public 26Law 104-191) and the Mental Health and Developmental   SB1504 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1Disabilities Confidentiality Act. 2    (c) The Department shall establish and maintain 3tax-supported child welfare services and extend and seek to 4improve voluntary services throughout the State, to the end 5that services and care shall be available on an equal basis 6throughout the State to children requiring such services.7    (d) The Director may authorize advance disbursements for 8any new program initiative to any agency contracting with the 9Department. As a prerequisite for an advance disbursement, the 10contractor must post a surety bond in the amount of the advance 11disbursement and have a purchase of service contract approved 12by the Department. The Department may pay up to 2 months 13operational expenses in advance. The amount of the advance 14disbursement shall be prorated over the life of the contract 15or the remaining months of the fiscal year, whichever is less, 16and the installment amount shall then be deducted from future 17bills. Advance disbursement authorizations for new initiatives 18shall not be made to any agency after that agency has operated 19during 2 consecutive fiscal years. The requirements of this 20Section concerning advance disbursements shall not apply with 21respect to the following: payments to local public agencies 22for child day care services as authorized by Section 5a of this 23Act; and youth service programs receiving grant funds under 24Section 17a-4.25    (e) (Blank).26    (f) (Blank).  SB1504 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    (g) The Department shall establish rules and regulations 2concerning its operation of programs designed to meet the 3goals of child safety and protection, family preservation, 4family reunification, and adoption, including, but not limited 5to:6        (1) adoption;7        (2) foster care;8        (3) family counseling;9        (4) protective services;10        (5) (blank);11        (6) homemaker service;12        (7) return of runaway children;13        (8) (blank);14        (9) placement under Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court 15    Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 4-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile 16    Court Act of 1987 in accordance with the federal Adoption 17    Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980; and18        (10) interstate services.19    Rules and regulations established by the Department shall 20include provisions for training Department staff and the staff 21of Department grantees, through contracts with other agencies 22or resources, in screening techniques to identify substance 23use disorders, as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 24approved by the Department of Human Services, as a successor 25to the Department of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse, for the 26purpose of identifying children and adults who should be   SB1504 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1referred for an assessment at an organization appropriately 2licensed by the Department of Human Services for substance use 3disorder treatment.4    (h) If the Department finds that there is no appropriate 5program or facility within or available to the Department for 6a youth in care and that no licensed private facility has an 7adequate and appropriate program or none agrees to accept the 8youth in care, the Department shall create an appropriate 9individualized, program-oriented plan for such youth in care. 10The plan may be developed within the Department or through 11purchase of services by the Department to the extent that it is 12within its statutory authority to do.13    (i) Service programs shall be available throughout the 14State and shall include but not be limited to the following 15services:16        (1) case management;17        (2) homemakers;18        (3) counseling;19        (4) parent education;20        (5) day care; and21        (6) emergency assistance and advocacy.22    In addition, the following services may be made available 23to assess and meet the needs of children and families:24        (1) comprehensive family-based services;25        (2) assessments;26        (3) respite care; and  SB1504 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (4) in-home health services.2    The Department shall provide transportation for any of the 3services it makes available to children or families or for 4which it refers children or families.5    (j) The Department may provide categories of financial 6assistance and education assistance grants, and shall 7establish rules and regulations concerning the assistance and 8grants, to persons who adopt children with physical or mental 9disabilities, children who are older, or other hard-to-place 10children who (i) immediately prior to their adoption were 11youth in care or (ii) were determined eligible for financial 12assistance with respect to a prior adoption and who become 13available for adoption because the prior adoption has been 14dissolved and the parental rights of the adoptive parents have 15been terminated or because the child's adoptive parents have 16died. The Department may continue to provide financial 17assistance and education assistance grants for a child who was 18determined eligible for financial assistance under this 19subsection (j) in the interim period beginning when the 20child's adoptive parents died and ending with the finalization 21of the new adoption of the child by another adoptive parent or 22parents. The Department may also provide categories of 23financial assistance and education assistance grants, and 24shall establish rules and regulations for the assistance and 25grants, to persons appointed guardian of the person under 26Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court Act or Section 2-27, 3-28,   SB1504 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b14-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for children 2who were youth in care for 12 months immediately prior to the 3appointment of the guardian.4    The amount of assistance may vary, depending upon the 5needs of the child and the adoptive parents, as set forth in 6the annual assistance agreement. Special purpose grants are 7allowed where the child requires special service but such 8costs may not exceed the amounts which similar services would 9cost the Department if it were to provide or secure them as 10guardian of the child.11    Any financial assistance provided under this subsection is 12inalienable by assignment, sale, execution, attachment, 13garnishment, or any other remedy for recovery or collection of 14a judgment or debt.15    (j-5) The Department shall not deny or delay the placement 16of a child for adoption if an approved family is available 17either outside of the Department region handling the case, or 18outside of the State of Illinois.19    (k) The Department shall accept for care and training any 20child who has been adjudicated neglected or abused, or 21dependent committed to it pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act 22or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.23    (l) The Department shall offer family preservation 24services, as defined in Section 8.2 of the Abused and 25Neglected Child Reporting Act, to help families, including 26adoptive and extended families. Family preservation services   SB1504 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1shall be offered (i) to prevent the placement of children in 2substitute care when the children can be cared for at home or 3in the custody of the person responsible for the children's 4welfare, (ii) to reunite children with their families, or 5(iii) to maintain an adoptive placement. Family preservation 6services shall only be offered when doing so will not endanger 7the children's health or safety. With respect to children who 8are in substitute care pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 91987, family preservation services shall not be offered if a 10goal other than those of subdivisions (A), (B), or (B-1) of 11subsection (2) of Section 2-28 of that Act has been set, except 12that reunification services may be offered as provided in 13paragraph (F) of subsection (2) of Section 2-28 of that Act. 14Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to create a 15private right of action or claim on the part of any individual 16or child welfare agency, except that when a child is the 17subject of an action under Article II of the Juvenile Court Act 18of 1987 and the child's service plan calls for services to 19facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, the court 20hearing the action under Article II of the Juvenile Court Act 21of 1987 may order the Department to provide the services set 22out in the plan, if those services are not provided with 23reasonable promptness and if those services are available.24    The Department shall notify the child and the child's 25family of the Department's responsibility to offer and provide 26family preservation services as identified in the service   SB1504 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1plan. The child and the child's family shall be eligible for 2services as soon as the report is determined to be 3"indicated". The Department may offer services to any child or 4family with respect to whom a report of suspected child abuse 5or neglect has been filed, prior to concluding its 6investigation under Section 7.12 of the Abused and Neglected 7Child Reporting Act. However, the child's or family's 8willingness to accept services shall not be considered in the 9investigation. The Department may also provide services to any 10child or family who is the subject of any report of suspected 11child abuse or neglect or may refer such child or family to 12services available from other agencies in the community, even 13if the report is determined to be unfounded, if the conditions 14in the child's or family's home are reasonably likely to 15subject the child or family to future reports of suspected 16child abuse or neglect. Acceptance of such services shall be 17voluntary. The Department may also provide services to any 18child or family after completion of a family assessment, as an 19alternative to an investigation, as provided under the 20"differential response program" provided for in subsection 21(a-5) of Section 7.4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 22Reporting Act.23    The Department may, at its discretion except for those 24children also adjudicated neglected or dependent, accept for 25care and training any child who has been adjudicated addicted, 26as a truant minor in need of supervision or as a minor   SB1504 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1requiring authoritative intervention, under the Juvenile Court 2Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, but no such child shall 3be committed to the Department by any court without the 4approval of the Department. On and after January 1, 2015 (the 5effective date of Public Act 98-803) and before January 1, 62017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 7Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 8adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 9or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 10less than 16 years of age committed to the Department under 11Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 12for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 13exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 14minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 15to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 162-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. On and after January 1, 172017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 18Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 19adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 20or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 21less than 15 years of age committed to the Department under 22Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 23for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 24exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 25minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 26to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section   SB1504 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b12-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. An independent basis 2exists when the allegations or adjudication of abuse, neglect, 3or dependency do not arise from the same facts, incident, or 4circumstances which give rise to a charge or adjudication of 5delinquency. The Department shall assign a caseworker to 6attend any hearing involving a youth in the care and custody of 7the Department who is placed on aftercare release, including 8hearings involving sanctions for violation of aftercare 9release conditions and aftercare release revocation hearings. 10    As soon as is possible after August 7, 2009 (the effective 11date of Public Act 96-134), the Department shall develop and 12implement a special program of family preservation services to 13support intact, foster, and adoptive families who are 14experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 15stress of caring for a child who has been diagnosed with a 16pervasive developmental disorder if the Department determines 17that those services are necessary to ensure the health and 18safety of the child. The Department may offer services to any 19family whether or not a report has been filed under the Abused 20and Neglected Child Reporting Act. The Department may refer 21the child or family to services available from other agencies 22in the community if the conditions in the child's or family's 23home are reasonably likely to subject the child or family to 24future reports of suspected child abuse or neglect. Acceptance 25of these services shall be voluntary. The Department shall 26develop and implement a public information campaign to alert   SB1504 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1health and social service providers and the general public 2about these special family preservation services. The nature 3and scope of the services offered and the number of families 4served under the special program implemented under this 5paragraph shall be determined by the level of funding that the 6Department annually allocates for this purpose. The term 7"pervasive developmental disorder" under this paragraph means 8a neurological condition, including, but not limited to, 9Asperger's Syndrome and autism, as defined in the most recent 10edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 11Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.12    (l-1) The General Assembly recognizes that the best 13interests of the child require that the child be placed in the 14most permanent living arrangement as soon as is practically 15possible. To achieve this goal, the General Assembly directs 16the Department of Children and Family Services to conduct 17concurrent planning so that permanency may occur at the 18earliest opportunity. Permanent living arrangements may 19include prevention of placement of a child outside the home of 20the family when the child can be cared for at home without 21endangering the child's health or safety; reunification with 22the family, when safe and appropriate, if temporary placement 23is necessary; or movement of the child toward the most 24permanent living arrangement and permanent legal status.25    When determining reasonable efforts to be made with 26respect to a child, as described in this subsection, and in   SB1504 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1making such reasonable efforts, the child's health and safety 2shall be the paramount concern.3    When a child is placed in foster care, the Department 4shall ensure and document that reasonable efforts were made to 5prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from the 6child's home. The Department must make reasonable efforts to 7reunify the family when temporary placement of the child 8occurs unless otherwise required, pursuant to the Juvenile 9Court Act of 1987. At any time after the dispositional hearing 10where the Department believes that further reunification 11services would be ineffective, it may request a finding from 12the court that reasonable efforts are no longer appropriate. 13The Department is not required to provide further 14reunification services after such a finding.15    A decision to place a child in substitute care shall be 16made with considerations of the child's health, safety, and 17best interests. At the time of placement, consideration should 18also be given so that if reunification fails or is delayed, the 19placement made is the best available placement to provide 20permanency for the child.21    The Department shall adopt rules addressing concurrent 22planning for reunification and permanency. The Department 23shall consider the following factors when determining 24appropriateness of concurrent planning:25        (1) the likelihood of prompt reunification;26        (2) the past history of the family;  SB1504 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (3) the barriers to reunification being addressed by 2    the family;3        (4) the level of cooperation of the family;4        (5) the foster parents' willingness to work with the 5    family to reunite;6        (6) the willingness and ability of the foster family 7    to provide an adoptive home or long-term placement;8        (7) the age of the child;9        (8) placement of siblings.10    (m) The Department may assume temporary custody of any 11child if:12        (1) it has received a written consent to such 13    temporary custody signed by the parents of the child or by 14    the parent having custody of the child if the parents are 15    not living together or by the guardian or custodian of the 16    child if the child is not in the custody of either parent, 17    or18        (2) the child is found in the State and neither a 19    parent, guardian nor custodian of the child can be 20    located.21If the child is found in the child's residence without a 22parent, guardian, custodian, or responsible caretaker, the 23Department may, instead of removing the child and assuming 24temporary custody, place an authorized representative of the 25Department in that residence until such time as a parent, 26guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses a   SB1504 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1willingness and apparent ability to ensure the child's health 2and safety and resume permanent charge of the child, or until a 3relative enters the home and is willing and able to ensure the 4child's health and safety and assume charge of the child until 5a parent, guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses 6such willingness and ability to ensure the child's safety and 7resume permanent charge. After a caretaker has remained in the 8home for a period not to exceed 12 hours, the Department must 9follow those procedures outlined in Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 105-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.11    The Department shall have the authority, responsibilities 12and duties that a legal custodian of the child would have 13pursuant to subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile 14Court Act of 1987. Whenever a child is taken into temporary 15custody pursuant to an investigation under the Abused and 16Neglected Child Reporting Act, or pursuant to a referral and 17acceptance under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of a minor in 18limited custody, the Department, during the period of 19temporary custody and before the child is brought before a 20judicial officer as required by Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 215-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, shall have the 22authority, responsibilities and duties that a legal custodian 23of the child would have under subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of 24the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.25    The Department shall ensure that any child taken into 26custody is scheduled for an appointment for a medical   SB1504 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1examination.2    A parent, guardian, or custodian of a child in the 3temporary custody of the Department who would have custody of 4the child if the child were not in the temporary custody of the 5Department may deliver to the Department a signed request that 6the Department surrender the temporary custody of the child. 7The Department may retain temporary custody of the child for 810 days after the receipt of the request, during which period 9the Department may cause to be filed a petition pursuant to the 10Juvenile Court Act of 1987. If a petition is so filed, the 11Department shall retain temporary custody of the child until 12the court orders otherwise. If a petition is not filed within 13the 10-day period, the child shall be surrendered to the 14custody of the requesting parent, guardian, or custodian not 15later than the expiration of the 10-day period, at which time 16the authority and duties of the Department with respect to the 17temporary custody of the child shall terminate.18    (m-1) The Department may place children under 18 years of 19age in a secure child care facility licensed by the Department 20that cares for children who are in need of secure living 21arrangements for their health, safety, and well-being after a 22determination is made by the facility director and the 23Director or the Director's designate prior to admission to the 24facility subject to Section 2-27.1 of the Juvenile Court Act 25of 1987. This subsection (m-1) does not apply to a child who is 26subject to placement in a correctional facility operated   SB1504 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1pursuant to Section 3-15-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections, 2unless the child is a youth in care who was placed in the care 3of the Department before being subject to placement in a 4correctional facility and a court of competent jurisdiction 5has ordered placement of the child in a secure care facility.6    (n) The Department may place children under 18 years of 7age in licensed child care facilities when in the opinion of 8the Department, appropriate services aimed at family 9preservation have been unsuccessful and cannot ensure the 10child's health and safety or are unavailable and such 11placement would be for their best interest. Payment for board, 12clothing, care, training and supervision of any child placed 13in a licensed child care facility may be made by the 14Department, by the parents or guardians of the estates of 15those children, or by both the Department and the parents or 16guardians, except that no payments shall be made by the 17Department for any child placed in a licensed child care 18facility for board, clothing, care, training, and supervision 19of such a child that exceed the average per capita cost of 20maintaining and of caring for a child in institutions for 21dependent or neglected children operated by the Department. 22However, such restriction on payments does not apply in cases 23where children require specialized care and treatment for 24problems of severe emotional disturbance, physical disability, 25social adjustment, or any combination thereof and suitable 26facilities for the placement of such children are not   SB1504 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1available at payment rates within the limitations set forth in 2this Section. All reimbursements for services delivered shall 3be absolutely inalienable by assignment, sale, attachment, or 4garnishment or otherwise.5    (n-1) The Department shall provide or authorize child 6welfare services, aimed at assisting minors to achieve 7sustainable self-sufficiency as independent adults, for any 8minor eligible for the reinstatement of wardship pursuant to 9subsection (2) of Section 2-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 101987, whether or not such reinstatement is sought or allowed, 11provided that the minor consents to such services and has not 12yet attained the age of 21. The Department shall have 13responsibility for the development and delivery of services 14under this Section. An eligible youth may access services 15under this Section through the Department of Children and 16Family Services or by referral from the Department of Human 17Services. Youth participating in services under this Section 18shall cooperate with the assigned case manager in developing 19an agreement identifying the services to be provided and how 20the youth will increase skills to achieve self-sufficiency. A 21homeless shelter is not considered appropriate housing for any 22youth receiving child welfare services under this Section. The 23Department shall continue child welfare services under this 24Section to any eligible minor until the minor becomes 21 years 25of age, no longer consents to participate, or achieves 26self-sufficiency as identified in the minor's service plan.   SB1504 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1The Department of Children and Family Services shall create 2clear, readable notice of the rights of former foster youth to 3child welfare services under this Section and how such 4services may be obtained. The Department of Children and 5Family Services and the Department of Human Services shall 6disseminate this information statewide. The Department shall 7adopt regulations describing services intended to assist 8minors in achieving sustainable self-sufficiency as 9independent adults. 10    (o) The Department shall establish an administrative 11review and appeal process for children and families who 12request or receive child welfare services from the Department. 13Youth in care who are placed by private child welfare 14agencies, and foster families with whom those youth are 15placed, shall be afforded the same procedural and appeal 16rights as children and families in the case of placement by the 17Department, including the right to an initial review of a 18private agency decision by that agency. The Department shall 19ensure that any private child welfare agency, which accepts 20youth in care for placement, affords those rights to children 21and foster families. The Department shall accept for 22administrative review and an appeal hearing a complaint made 23by (i) a child or foster family concerning a decision 24following an initial review by a private child welfare agency 25or (ii) a prospective adoptive parent who alleges a violation 26of subsection (j-5) of this Section. An appeal of a decision   SB1504 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1concerning a change in the placement of a child shall be 2conducted in an expedited manner. A court determination that a 3current foster home placement is necessary and appropriate 4under Section 2-28 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 does not 5constitute a judicial determination on the merits of an 6administrative appeal, filed by a former foster parent, 7involving a change of placement decision.8    (p) (Blank).9    (q) The Department may receive and use, in their entirety, 10for the benefit of children any gift, donation, or bequest of 11money or other property which is received on behalf of such 12children, or any financial benefits to which such children are 13or may become entitled while under the jurisdiction or care of 14the Department, except that the benefits described in Section 155.46 must be used and conserved consistent with the provisions 16under Section 5.46.17    The Department shall set up and administer no-cost, 18interest-bearing accounts in appropriate financial 19institutions for children for whom the Department is legally 20responsible and who have been determined eligible for 21Veterans' Benefits, Social Security benefits, assistance 22allotments from the armed forces, court ordered payments, 23parental voluntary payments, Supplemental Security Income, 24Railroad Retirement payments, Black Lung benefits, or other 25miscellaneous payments. Interest earned by each account shall 26be credited to the account, unless disbursed in accordance   SB1504 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1with this subsection.2    In disbursing funds from children's accounts, the 3Department shall:4        (1) Establish standards in accordance with State and 5    federal laws for disbursing money from children's 6    accounts. In all circumstances, the Department's 7    Guardianship Administrator or the Guardianship 8    Administrator's designee must approve disbursements from 9    children's accounts. The Department shall be responsible 10    for keeping complete records of all disbursements for each 11    account for any purpose.12        (2) Calculate on a monthly basis the amounts paid from 13    State funds for the child's board and care, medical care 14    not covered under Medicaid, and social services; and 15    utilize funds from the child's account, as covered by 16    regulation, to reimburse those costs. Monthly, 17    disbursements from all children's accounts, up to 1/12 of 18    $13,000,000, shall be deposited by the Department into the 19    General Revenue Fund and the balance over 1/12 of 20    $13,000,000 into the DCFS Children's Services Fund.21        (3) Maintain any balance remaining after reimbursing 22    for the child's costs of care, as specified in item (2). 23    The balance shall accumulate in accordance with relevant 24    State and federal laws and shall be disbursed to the child 25    or the child's guardian or to the issuing agency.26    (r) The Department shall promulgate regulations   SB1504 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1encouraging all adoption agencies to voluntarily forward to 2the Department or its agent names and addresses of all persons 3who have applied for and have been approved for adoption of a 4hard-to-place child or child with a disability and the names 5of such children who have not been placed for adoption. A list 6of such names and addresses shall be maintained by the 7Department or its agent, and coded lists which maintain the 8confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 9of the child shall be made available, without charge, to every 10adoption agency in the State to assist the agencies in placing 11such children for adoption. The Department may delegate to an 12agent its duty to maintain and make available such lists. The 13Department shall ensure that such agent maintains the 14confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 15of the child.16    (s) The Department of Children and Family Services may 17establish and implement a program to reimburse Department and 18private child welfare agency foster parents licensed by the 19Department of Children and Family Services for damages 20sustained by the foster parents as a result of the malicious or 21negligent acts of foster children, as well as providing third 22party coverage for such foster parents with regard to actions 23of foster children to other individuals. Such coverage will be 24secondary to the foster parent liability insurance policy, if 25applicable. The program shall be funded through appropriations 26from the General Revenue Fund, specifically designated for   SB1504 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1such purposes.2    (t) The Department shall perform home studies and 3investigations and shall exercise supervision over visitation 4as ordered by a court pursuant to the Illinois Marriage and 5Dissolution of Marriage Act or the Adoption Act only if:6        (1) an order entered by an Illinois court specifically 7    directs the Department to perform such services; and8        (2) the court has ordered one or both of the parties to 9    the proceeding to reimburse the Department for its 10    reasonable costs for providing such services in accordance 11    with Department rules, or has determined that neither 12    party is financially able to pay.13    The Department shall provide written notification to the 14court of the specific arrangements for supervised visitation 15and projected monthly costs within 60 days of the court order. 16The Department shall send to the court information related to 17the costs incurred except in cases where the court has 18determined the parties are financially unable to pay. The 19court may order additional periodic reports as appropriate.20    (u) In addition to other information that must be 21provided, whenever the Department places a child with a 22prospective adoptive parent or parents, in a licensed foster 23home, group home, or child care institution, or in a relative 24home, the Department shall provide to the prospective adoptive 25parent or parents or other caretaker:26        (1) available detailed information concerning the   SB1504 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    child's educational and health history, copies of 2    immunization records (including insurance and medical card 3    information), a history of the child's previous 4    placements, if any, and reasons for placement changes 5    excluding any information that identifies or reveals the 6    location of any previous caretaker;7        (2) a copy of the child's portion of the client 8    service plan, including any visitation arrangement, and 9    all amendments or revisions to it as related to the child; 10    and11        (3) information containing details of the child's 12    individualized educational plan when the child is 13    receiving special education services.14    The caretaker shall be informed of any known social or 15behavioral information (including, but not limited to, 16criminal background, fire setting, perpetuation of sexual 17abuse, destructive behavior, and substance abuse) necessary to 18care for and safeguard the children to be placed or currently 19in the home. The Department may prepare a written summary of 20the information required by this paragraph, which may be 21provided to the foster or prospective adoptive parent in 22advance of a placement. The foster or prospective adoptive 23parent may review the supporting documents in the child's file 24in the presence of casework staff. In the case of an emergency 25placement, casework staff shall at least provide known 26information verbally, if necessary, and must subsequently   SB1504 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1provide the information in writing as required by this 2subsection. 3    The information described in this subsection shall be 4provided in writing. In the case of emergency placements when 5time does not allow prior review, preparation, and collection 6of written information, the Department shall provide such 7information as it becomes available. Within 10 business days 8after placement, the Department shall obtain from the 9prospective adoptive parent or parents or other caretaker a 10signed verification of receipt of the information provided. 11Within 10 business days after placement, the Department shall 12provide to the child's guardian ad litem a copy of the 13information provided to the prospective adoptive parent or 14parents or other caretaker. The information provided to the 15prospective adoptive parent or parents or other caretaker 16shall be reviewed and approved regarding accuracy at the 17supervisory level. 18    (u-5) Effective July 1, 1995, only foster care placements 19licensed as foster family homes pursuant to the Child Care Act 20of 1969 shall be eligible to receive foster care payments from 21the Department. Relative caregivers who, as of July 1, 1995, 22were approved pursuant to approved relative placement rules 23previously promulgated by the Department at 89 Ill. Adm. Code 24335 and had submitted an application for licensure as a foster 25family home may continue to receive foster care payments only 26until the Department determines that they may be licensed as a   SB1504 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1foster family home or that their application for licensure is 2denied or until September 30, 1995, whichever occurs first.3    (v) The Department shall access criminal history record 4information as defined in the Illinois Uniform Conviction 5Information Act and information maintained in the adjudicatory 6and dispositional record system as defined in Section 2605-355 7of the Illinois State Police Law if the Department determines 8the information is necessary to perform its duties under the 9Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, the Child Care Act 10of 1969, and the Children and Family Services Act. The 11Department shall provide for interactive computerized 12communication and processing equipment that permits direct 13on-line communication with the Illinois State Police's central 14criminal history data repository. The Department shall comply 15with all certification requirements and provide certified 16operators who have been trained by personnel from the Illinois 17State Police. In addition, one Office of the Inspector General 18investigator shall have training in the use of the criminal 19history information access system and have access to the 20terminal. The Department of Children and Family Services and 21its employees shall abide by rules and regulations established 22by the Illinois State Police relating to the access and 23dissemination of this information.24    (v-1) Prior to final approval for placement of a child, 25the Department shall conduct a criminal records background 26check of the prospective foster or adoptive parent, including   SB1504 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1fingerprint-based checks of national crime information 2databases. Final approval for placement shall not be granted 3if the record check reveals a felony conviction for child 4abuse or neglect, for spousal abuse, for a crime against 5children, or for a crime involving violence, including rape, 6sexual assault, or homicide, but not including other physical 7assault or battery, or if there is a felony conviction for 8physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense committed 9within the past 5 years.10    (v-2) Prior to final approval for placement of a child, 11the Department shall check its child abuse and neglect 12registry for information concerning prospective foster and 13adoptive parents, and any adult living in the home. If any 14prospective foster or adoptive parent or other adult living in 15the home has resided in another state in the preceding 5 years, 16the Department shall request a check of that other state's 17child abuse and neglect registry. 18    (w) Within 120 days of August 20, 1995 (the effective date 19of Public Act 89-392), the Department shall prepare and submit 20to the Governor and the General Assembly, a written plan for 21the development of in-state licensed secure child care 22facilities that care for children who are in need of secure 23living arrangements for their health, safety, and well-being. 24For purposes of this subsection, secure care facility shall 25mean a facility that is designed and operated to ensure that 26all entrances and exits from the facility, a building or a   SB1504 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1distinct part of the building, are under the exclusive control 2of the staff of the facility, whether or not the child has the 3freedom of movement within the perimeter of the facility, 4building, or distinct part of the building. The plan shall 5include descriptions of the types of facilities that are 6needed in Illinois; the cost of developing these secure care 7facilities; the estimated number of placements; the potential 8cost savings resulting from the movement of children currently 9out-of-state who are projected to be returned to Illinois; the 10necessary geographic distribution of these facilities in 11Illinois; and a proposed timetable for development of such 12facilities.13    (x) The Department shall conduct annual credit history 14checks to determine the financial history of children placed 15under its guardianship pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 161987. The Department shall conduct such credit checks starting 17when a youth in care turns 12 years old and each year 18thereafter for the duration of the guardianship as terminated 19pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. The Department 20shall determine if financial exploitation of the child's 21personal information has occurred. If financial exploitation 22appears to have taken place or is presently ongoing, the 23Department shall notify the proper law enforcement agency, the 24proper State's Attorney, or the Attorney General.25    (y) Beginning on July 22, 2010 (the effective date of 26Public Act 96-1189), a child with a disability who receives   SB1504 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1residential and educational services from the Department shall 2be eligible to receive transition services in accordance with 3Article 14 of the School Code from the age of 14.5 through age 421, inclusive, notwithstanding the child's residential 5services arrangement. For purposes of this subsection, "child 6with a disability" means a child with a disability as defined 7by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 8Improvement Act of 2004. 9    (z) The Department shall access criminal history record 10information as defined as "background information" in this 11subsection and criminal history record information as defined 12in the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act for each 13Department employee or Department applicant. Each Department 14employee or Department applicant shall submit the employee's 15or applicant's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in 16the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. 17These fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint 18records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police 19and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history 20records databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a 21fee for conducting the criminal history record check, which 22shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund and 23shall not exceed the actual cost of the record check. The 24Illinois State Police shall furnish, pursuant to positive 25identification, all Illinois conviction information to the 26Department of Children and Family Services.   SB1504 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    For purposes of this subsection: 2    "Background information" means all of the following: 3        (i) Upon the request of the Department of Children and 4    Family Services, conviction information obtained from the 5    Illinois State Police as a result of a fingerprint-based 6    criminal history records check of the Illinois criminal 7    history records database and the Federal Bureau of 8    Investigation criminal history records database concerning 9    a Department employee or Department applicant. 10        (ii) Information obtained by the Department of 11    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 12    the Illinois State Police's Sex Offender Database, as 13    authorized by Section 120 of the Sex Offender Community 14    Notification Law, concerning a Department employee or 15    Department applicant. 16        (iii) Information obtained by the Department of 17    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 18    the Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System (CANTS) 19    operated and maintained by the Department. 20    "Department employee" means a full-time or temporary 21employee coded or certified within the State of Illinois 22Personnel System. 23    "Department applicant" means an individual who has 24conditional Department full-time or part-time work, a 25contractor, an individual used to replace or supplement staff, 26an academic intern, a volunteer in Department offices or on   SB1504 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1Department contracts, a work-study student, an individual or 2entity licensed by the Department, or an unlicensed service 3provider who works as a condition of a contract or an agreement 4and whose work may bring the unlicensed service provider into 5contact with Department clients or client records. 6(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-1014, eff. 5-27-22; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-50, eff. 81-1-24; 103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 9    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-1061)10    Sec. 5. Direct child welfare services; Department of 11Children and Family Services. To provide direct child welfare 12services when not available through other public or private 13child care or program facilities.14    (a) For purposes of this Section:15        (1) "Children" means persons found within the State 16    who are under the age of 18 years. The term also includes 17    persons under age 21 who:18            (A) were committed to the Department pursuant to 19        the Juvenile Court Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 20        1987 and who continue under the jurisdiction of the 21        court; or22            (B) were accepted for care, service and training 23        by the Department prior to the age of 18 and whose best 24        interest in the discretion of the Department would be 25        served by continuing that care, service and training   SB1504 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        because of severe emotional disturbances, physical 2        disability, social adjustment or any combination 3        thereof, or because of the need to complete an 4        educational or vocational training program.5        (2) "Homeless youth" means persons found within the 6    State who are under the age of 19, are not in a safe and 7    stable living situation and cannot be reunited with their 8    families.9        (3) "Child welfare services" means public social 10    services which are directed toward the accomplishment of 11    the following purposes:12            (A) protecting and promoting the health, safety 13        and welfare of children, including homeless, 14        dependent, or neglected children;15            (B) remedying, or assisting in the solution of 16        problems which may result in, the neglect, abuse, 17        exploitation, or delinquency of children;18            (C) preventing the unnecessary separation of 19        children from their families by identifying family 20        problems, assisting families in resolving their 21        problems, and preventing the breakup of the family 22        where the prevention of child removal is desirable and 23        possible when the child can be cared for at home 24        without endangering the child's health and safety;25            (D) restoring to their families children who have 26        been removed, by the provision of services to the   SB1504 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        child and the families when the child can be cared for 2        at home without endangering the child's health and 3        safety;4            (E) placing children in suitable permanent family 5        arrangements, through guardianship or adoption, in 6        cases where restoration to the birth family is not 7        safe, possible, or appropriate;8            (F) at the time of placement, conducting 9        concurrent planning, as described in subsection (l-1) 10        of this Section, so that permanency may occur at the 11        earliest opportunity. Consideration should be given so 12        that if reunification fails or is delayed, the 13        placement made is the best available placement to 14        provide permanency for the child;15            (F-1) preparing adolescents to successfully 16        transition to independence, including transition 17        planning for youth who qualify for a guardian as a 18        person with a disability under Article XIa of the 19        Probate Act of 1975; 20            (G) (blank);21            (H) (blank); and22            (I) placing and maintaining children in facilities 23        that provide separate living quarters for children 24        under the age of 18 and for children 18 years of age 25        and older, unless a child 18 years of age is in the 26        last year of high school education or vocational   SB1504 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        training, in an approved individual or group treatment 2        program, in a licensed shelter facility, or secure 3        child care facility. The Department is not required to 4        place or maintain children:5                (i) who are in a foster home, or6                (ii) who are persons with a developmental 7            disability, as defined in the Mental Health and 8            Developmental Disabilities Code, or9                (iii) who are female children who are 10            pregnant, pregnant and parenting, or parenting, or11                (iv) who are siblings, in facilities that 12            provide separate living quarters for children 18 13            years of age and older and for children under 18 14            years of age.15    (b) (Blank).16    (b-5) The Department shall adopt rules to establish a 17process for all licensed residential providers in Illinois to 18submit data as required by the Department if they contract or 19receive reimbursement for children's mental health, substance 20use, and developmental disability services from the Department 21of Human Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 22Department of Healthcare and Family Services. The requested 23data must include, but is not limited to, capacity, staffing, 24and occupancy data for the purpose of establishing State need 25and placement availability. 26    All information collected, shared, or stored pursuant to   SB1504 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1this subsection shall be handled in accordance with all State 2and federal privacy laws and accompanying regulations and 3rules, including without limitation the federal Health 4Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public 5Law 104-191) and the Mental Health and Developmental 6Disabilities Confidentiality Act. 7    (c) The Department shall establish and maintain 8tax-supported child welfare services and extend and seek to 9improve voluntary services throughout the State, to the end 10that services and care shall be available on an equal basis 11throughout the State to children requiring such services.12    (d) The Director may authorize advance disbursements for 13any new program initiative to any agency contracting with the 14Department. As a prerequisite for an advance disbursement, the 15contractor must post a surety bond in the amount of the advance 16disbursement and have a purchase of service contract approved 17by the Department. The Department may pay up to 2 months 18operational expenses in advance. The amount of the advance 19disbursement shall be prorated over the life of the contract 20or the remaining months of the fiscal year, whichever is less, 21and the installment amount shall then be deducted from future 22bills. Advance disbursement authorizations for new initiatives 23shall not be made to any agency after that agency has operated 24during 2 consecutive fiscal years. The requirements of this 25Section concerning advance disbursements shall not apply with 26respect to the following: payments to local public agencies   SB1504 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1for child day care services as authorized by Section 5a of this 2Act; and youth service programs receiving grant funds under 3Section 17a-4.4    (e) (Blank).5    (f) (Blank).6    (g) The Department shall establish rules and regulations 7concerning its operation of programs designed to meet the 8goals of child safety and protection, family preservation, and 9permanency, including, but not limited to:10        (1) reunification, guardianship, and adoption;11        (2) relative and licensed foster care;12        (3) family counseling;13        (4) protective services;14        (5) (blank);15        (6) homemaker service;16        (7) return of runaway children;17        (8) (blank);18        (9) placement under Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court 19    Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 4-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile 20    Court Act of 1987 in accordance with the federal Adoption 21    Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980; and22        (10) interstate services; and .23        (11) transition planning for youth aging out of care. 24    Rules and regulations established by the Department shall 25include provisions for training Department staff and the staff 26of Department grantees, through contracts with other agencies   SB1504 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1or resources, in screening techniques to identify substance 2use disorders, as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 3approved by the Department of Human Services, as a successor 4to the Department of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse, for the 5purpose of identifying children and adults who should be 6referred for an assessment at an organization appropriately 7licensed by the Department of Human Services for substance use 8disorder treatment.9    (h) If the Department finds that there is no appropriate 10program or facility within or available to the Department for 11a youth in care and that no licensed private facility has an 12adequate and appropriate program or none agrees to accept the 13youth in care, the Department shall create an appropriate 14individualized, program-oriented plan for such youth in care. 15The plan may be developed within the Department or through 16purchase of services by the Department to the extent that it is 17within its statutory authority to do.18    (i) Service programs shall be available throughout the 19State and shall include but not be limited to the following 20services:21        (1) case management;22        (2) homemakers;23        (3) counseling;24        (4) parent education;25        (5) day care;26        (6) emergency assistance and advocacy; and  SB1504 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (7) kinship navigator and relative caregiver supports. 2    In addition, the following services may be made available 3to assess and meet the needs of children and families:4        (1) comprehensive family-based services;5        (2) assessments;6        (3) respite care; and7        (4) in-home health services.8    The Department shall provide transportation for any of the 9services it makes available to children or families or for 10which it refers children or families.11    (j) The Department may provide categories of financial 12assistance and education assistance grants, and shall 13establish rules and regulations concerning the assistance and 14grants, to persons who adopt or become subsidized guardians of 15children with physical or mental disabilities, children who 16are older, or other hard-to-place children who (i) immediately 17prior to their adoption or subsidized guardianship were youth 18in care or (ii) were determined eligible for financial 19assistance with respect to a prior adoption and who become 20available for adoption because the prior adoption has been 21dissolved and the parental rights of the adoptive parents have 22been terminated or because the child's adoptive parents have 23died. The Department may continue to provide financial 24assistance and education assistance grants for a child who was 25determined eligible for financial assistance under this 26subsection (j) in the interim period beginning when the   SB1504 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1child's adoptive parents died and ending with the finalization 2of the new adoption of the child by another adoptive parent or 3parents. The Department may also provide categories of 4financial assistance and education assistance grants, and 5shall establish rules and regulations for the assistance and 6grants, to persons appointed guardian of the person under 7Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 84-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for children 9who were youth in care for 12 months immediately prior to the 10appointment of the guardian.11    The amount of assistance may vary, depending upon the 12needs of the child and the adoptive parents or subsidized 13guardians, as set forth in the annual assistance agreement. 14Special purpose grants are allowed where the child requires 15special service but such costs may not exceed the amounts 16which similar services would cost the Department if it were to 17provide or secure them as guardian of the child.18    Any financial assistance provided under this subsection is 19inalienable by assignment, sale, execution, attachment, 20garnishment, or any other remedy for recovery or collection of 21a judgment or debt.22    (j-5) The Department shall not deny or delay the placement 23of a child for adoption if an approved family is available 24either outside of the Department region handling the case, or 25outside of the State of Illinois.26    (k) The Department shall accept for care and training any   SB1504 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1child who has been adjudicated neglected or abused, or 2dependent committed to it pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act 3or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.4    (l) The Department shall offer family preservation 5services, as defined in Section 8.2 of the Abused and 6Neglected Child Reporting Act, to help families, including 7adoptive and extended families. Family preservation services 8shall be offered (i) to prevent the placement of children in 9substitute care when the children can be cared for at home or 10in the custody of the person responsible for the children's 11welfare, (ii) to reunite children with their families, or 12(iii) to maintain an adoption or subsidized guardianship. 13Family preservation services shall only be offered when doing 14so will not endanger the children's health or safety. With 15respect to children who are in substitute care pursuant to the 16Juvenile Court Act of 1987, family preservation services shall 17not be offered if a goal other than those of subdivisions (A), 18(B), or (B-1) of subsection (2.3) of Section 2-28 of that Act 19has been set, except that reunification services may be 20offered as provided in paragraph (F) of subsection (2.3) of 21Section 2-28 of that Act. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 22construed to create a private right of action or claim on the 23part of any individual or child welfare agency, except that 24when a child is the subject of an action under Article II of 25the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and the child's service plan 26calls for services to facilitate achievement of the permanency   SB1504 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1goal, the court hearing the action under Article II of the 2Juvenile Court Act of 1987 may order the Department to provide 3the services set out in the plan, if those services are not 4provided with reasonable promptness and if those services are 5available.6    The Department shall notify the child and the child's 7family of the Department's responsibility to offer and provide 8family preservation services as identified in the service 9plan. The child and the child's family shall be eligible for 10services as soon as the report is determined to be 11"indicated". The Department may offer services to any child or 12family with respect to whom a report of suspected child abuse 13or neglect has been filed, prior to concluding its 14investigation under Section 7.12 of the Abused and Neglected 15Child Reporting Act. However, the child's or family's 16willingness to accept services shall not be considered in the 17investigation. The Department may also provide services to any 18child or family who is the subject of any report of suspected 19child abuse or neglect or may refer such child or family to 20services available from other agencies in the community, even 21if the report is determined to be unfounded, if the conditions 22in the child's or family's home are reasonably likely to 23subject the child or family to future reports of suspected 24child abuse or neglect. Acceptance of such services shall be 25voluntary. The Department may also provide services to any 26child or family after completion of a family assessment, as an   SB1504 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1alternative to an investigation, as provided under the 2"differential response program" provided for in subsection 3(a-5) of Section 7.4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 4Reporting Act.5    The Department may, at its discretion except for those 6children also adjudicated neglected or dependent, accept for 7care and training any child who has been adjudicated addicted, 8as a truant minor in need of supervision or as a minor 9requiring authoritative intervention, under the Juvenile Court 10Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, but no such child shall 11be committed to the Department by any court without the 12approval of the Department. On and after January 1, 2015 (the 13effective date of Public Act 98-803) and before January 1, 142017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 15Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 16adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 17or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 18less than 16 years of age committed to the Department under 19Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 20for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 21exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 22minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 23to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 242-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. On and after January 1, 252017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 26Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or   SB1504 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 2or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 3less than 15 years of age committed to the Department under 4Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 5for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 6exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 7minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 8to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 92-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. An independent basis 10exists when the allegations or adjudication of abuse, neglect, 11or dependency do not arise from the same facts, incident, or 12circumstances which give rise to a charge or adjudication of 13delinquency. The Department shall assign a caseworker to 14attend any hearing involving a youth in the care and custody of 15the Department who is placed on aftercare release, including 16hearings involving sanctions for violation of aftercare 17release conditions and aftercare release revocation hearings. 18    As soon as is possible, the Department shall develop and 19implement a special program of family preservation services to 20support intact, relative, foster, and adoptive families who 21are experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 22stress of caring for a child who has been diagnosed with a 23pervasive developmental disorder if the Department determines 24that those services are necessary to ensure the health and 25safety of the child. The Department may offer services to any 26family whether or not a report has been filed under the Abused   SB1504 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1and Neglected Child Reporting Act. The Department may refer 2the child or family to services available from other agencies 3in the community if the conditions in the child's or family's 4home are reasonably likely to subject the child or family to 5future reports of suspected child abuse or neglect. Acceptance 6of these services shall be voluntary. The Department shall 7develop and implement a public information campaign to alert 8health and social service providers and the general public 9about these special family preservation services. The nature 10and scope of the services offered and the number of families 11served under the special program implemented under this 12paragraph shall be determined by the level of funding that the 13Department annually allocates for this purpose. The term 14"pervasive developmental disorder" under this paragraph means 15a neurological condition, including, but not limited to, 16Asperger's Syndrome and autism, as defined in the most recent 17edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 18Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.19    (l-1) The General Assembly recognizes that the best 20interests of the child require that the child be placed in the 21most permanent living arrangement that is an appropriate 22option for the child, consistent with the child's best 23interest, using the factors set forth in subsection (4.05) of 24Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 as soon as is 25practically possible. To achieve this goal, the General 26Assembly directs the Department of Children and Family   SB1504 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1Services to conduct concurrent planning so that permanency may 2occur at the earliest opportunity. Permanent living 3arrangements may include prevention of placement of a child 4outside the home of the family when the child can be cared for 5at home without endangering the child's health or safety; 6reunification with the family, when safe and appropriate, if 7temporary placement is necessary; or movement of the child 8toward the most appropriate living arrangement and legal 9status.10    When determining reasonable efforts to be made with 11respect to a child, as described in this subsection, and in 12making such reasonable efforts, the child's health and safety 13shall be the paramount concern.14    When a child is placed in foster care, the Department 15shall ensure and document that reasonable efforts were made to 16prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from the 17child's home. The Department must make reasonable efforts to 18reunify the family when temporary placement of the child 19occurs unless otherwise required, pursuant to the Juvenile 20Court Act of 1987. At any time after the dispositional hearing 21where the Department believes that further reunification 22services would be ineffective, it may request a finding from 23the court that reasonable efforts are no longer appropriate. 24The Department is not required to provide further 25reunification services after such a finding.26    A decision to place a child in substitute care shall be   SB1504 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1made with considerations of the child's health, safety, and 2best interests. The Department shall make diligent efforts to 3place the child with a relative, document those diligent 4efforts, and document reasons for any failure or inability to 5secure such a relative placement. If the primary issue 6preventing an emergency placement of a child with a relative 7is a lack of resources, including, but not limited to, 8concrete goods, safety modifications, and services, the 9Department shall make diligent efforts to assist the relative 10in obtaining the necessary resources. No later than July 1, 112025, the Department shall adopt rules defining what is 12diligent and necessary in providing supports to potential 13relative placements. At the time of placement, consideration 14should also be given so that if reunification fails or is 15delayed, the placement has the potential to be an appropriate 16permanent placement for the child.17    The Department shall adopt rules addressing concurrent 18planning for reunification and permanency. The Department 19shall consider the following factors when determining 20appropriateness of concurrent planning:21        (1) the likelihood of prompt reunification;22        (2) the past history of the family;23        (3) the barriers to reunification being addressed by 24    the family;25        (4) the level of cooperation of the family;26        (4.5) the child's wishes;   SB1504 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (5) the caregivers' willingness to work with the 2    family to reunite;3        (6) the willingness and ability of the caregivers' to 4    provide a permanent placement;5        (7) the age of the child;6        (8) placement of siblings; and7        (9) the wishes of the parent or parents unless the 8    parental preferences are contrary to the best interests of 9    the child. 10    (m) The Department may assume temporary custody of any 11child if:12        (1) it has received a written consent to such 13    temporary custody signed by the parents of the child or by 14    the parent having custody of the child if the parents are 15    not living together or by the guardian or custodian of the 16    child if the child is not in the custody of either parent, 17    or18        (2) the child is found in the State and neither a 19    parent, guardian nor custodian of the child can be 20    located.21If the child is found in the child's residence without a 22parent, guardian, custodian, or responsible caretaker, the 23Department may, instead of removing the child and assuming 24temporary custody, place an authorized representative of the 25Department in that residence until such time as a parent, 26guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses a   SB1504 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1willingness and apparent ability to ensure the child's health 2and safety and resume permanent charge of the child, or until a 3relative enters the home and is willing and able to ensure the 4child's health and safety and assume charge of the child until 5a parent, guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses 6such willingness and ability to ensure the child's safety and 7resume permanent charge. After a caretaker has remained in the 8home for a period not to exceed 12 hours, the Department must 9follow those procedures outlined in Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 105-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.11    The Department shall have the authority, responsibilities 12and duties that a legal custodian of the child would have 13pursuant to subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile 14Court Act of 1987. Whenever a child is taken into temporary 15custody pursuant to an investigation under the Abused and 16Neglected Child Reporting Act, or pursuant to a referral and 17acceptance under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of a minor in 18limited custody, the Department, during the period of 19temporary custody and before the child is brought before a 20judicial officer as required by Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 215-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, shall have the 22authority, responsibilities and duties that a legal custodian 23of the child would have under subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of 24the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.25    The Department shall ensure that any child taken into 26custody is scheduled for an appointment for a medical   SB1504 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1examination.2    A parent, guardian, or custodian of a child in the 3temporary custody of the Department who would have custody of 4the child if the child were not in the temporary custody of the 5Department may deliver to the Department a signed request that 6the Department surrender the temporary custody of the child. 7The Department may retain temporary custody of the child for 810 days after the receipt of the request, during which period 9the Department may cause to be filed a petition pursuant to the 10Juvenile Court Act of 1987. If a petition is so filed, the 11Department shall retain temporary custody of the child until 12the court orders otherwise. If a petition is not filed within 13the 10-day period, the child shall be surrendered to the 14custody of the requesting parent, guardian, or custodian not 15later than the expiration of the 10-day period, at which time 16the authority and duties of the Department with respect to the 17temporary custody of the child shall terminate.18    (m-1) The Department may place children under 18 years of 19age in a secure child care facility licensed by the Department 20that cares for children who are in need of secure living 21arrangements for their health, safety, and well-being after a 22determination is made by the facility director and the 23Director or the Director's designate prior to admission to the 24facility subject to Section 2-27.1 of the Juvenile Court Act 25of 1987. This subsection (m-1) does not apply to a child who is 26subject to placement in a correctional facility operated   SB1504 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1pursuant to Section 3-15-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections, 2unless the child is a youth in care who was placed in the care 3of the Department before being subject to placement in a 4correctional facility and a court of competent jurisdiction 5has ordered placement of the child in a secure care facility.6    (n) The Department may place children under 18 years of 7age in licensed child care facilities when in the opinion of 8the Department, appropriate services aimed at family 9preservation have been unsuccessful and cannot ensure the 10child's health and safety or are unavailable and such 11placement would be for their best interest. Payment for board, 12clothing, care, training and supervision of any child placed 13in a licensed child care facility may be made by the 14Department, by the parents or guardians of the estates of 15those children, or by both the Department and the parents or 16guardians, except that no payments shall be made by the 17Department for any child placed in a licensed child care 18facility for board, clothing, care, training, and supervision 19of such a child that exceed the average per capita cost of 20maintaining and of caring for a child in institutions for 21dependent or neglected children operated by the Department. 22However, such restriction on payments does not apply in cases 23where children require specialized care and treatment for 24problems of severe emotional disturbance, physical disability, 25social adjustment, or any combination thereof and suitable 26facilities for the placement of such children are not   SB1504 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1available at payment rates within the limitations set forth in 2this Section. All reimbursements for services delivered shall 3be absolutely inalienable by assignment, sale, attachment, or 4garnishment or otherwise.5    (n-1) The Department shall provide or authorize child 6welfare services, aimed at assisting minors to achieve 7sustainable self-sufficiency as independent adults, for any 8minor eligible for the reinstatement of wardship pursuant to 9subsection (2) of Section 2-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 101987, whether or not such reinstatement is sought or allowed, 11provided that the minor consents to such services and has not 12yet attained the age of 21. The Department shall have 13responsibility for the development and delivery of services 14under this Section. An eligible youth may access services 15under this Section through the Department of Children and 16Family Services or by referral from the Department of Human 17Services. Youth participating in services under this Section 18shall cooperate with the assigned case manager in developing 19an agreement identifying the services to be provided and how 20the youth will increase skills to achieve self-sufficiency. A 21homeless shelter is not considered appropriate housing for any 22youth receiving child welfare services under this Section. The 23Department shall continue child welfare services under this 24Section to any eligible minor until the minor becomes 21 years 25of age, no longer consents to participate, or achieves 26self-sufficiency as identified in the minor's service plan.   SB1504 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1The Department of Children and Family Services shall create 2clear, readable notice of the rights of former foster youth to 3child welfare services under this Section and how such 4services may be obtained. The Department of Children and 5Family Services and the Department of Human Services shall 6disseminate this information statewide. The Department shall 7adopt regulations describing services intended to assist 8minors in achieving sustainable self-sufficiency as 9independent adults. 10    (o) The Department shall establish an administrative 11review and appeal process for children and families who 12request or receive child welfare services from the Department. 13Youth in care who are placed by private child welfare 14agencies, and caregivers with whom those youth are placed, 15shall be afforded the same procedural and appeal rights as 16children and families in the case of placement by the 17Department, including the right to an initial review of a 18private agency decision by that agency. The Department shall 19ensure that any private child welfare agency, which accepts 20youth in care for placement, affords those rights to children 21and caregivers with whom those children are placed. The 22Department shall accept for administrative review and an 23appeal hearing a complaint made by (i) a child or caregiver 24with whom the child is placed concerning a decision following 25an initial review by a private child welfare agency or (ii) a 26prospective adoptive parent who alleges a violation of   SB1504 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1subsection (j-5) of this Section. An appeal of a decision 2concerning a change in the placement of a child shall be 3conducted in an expedited manner. A court determination that a 4current placement is necessary and appropriate under Section 52-28 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 does not constitute a 6judicial determination on the merits of an administrative 7appeal, filed by a former caregiver, involving a change of 8placement decision. No later than July 1, 2025, the Department 9shall adopt rules to develop a reconsideration process to 10review: a denial of certification of a relative, a denial of 11placement with a relative, and a denial of visitation with an 12identified relative. Rules shall include standards and 13criteria for reconsideration that incorporate the best 14interests of the child under subsection (4.05) of Section 1-3 15of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, address situations where 16multiple relatives seek certification, and provide that all 17rules regarding placement changes shall be followed. The rules 18shall outline the essential elements of each form used in the 19implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this 20amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 21    (p) (Blank).22    (q) The Department may receive and use, in their entirety, 23for the benefit of children any gift, donation, or bequest of 24money or other property which is received on behalf of such 25children, or any financial benefits to which such children are 26or may become entitled while under the jurisdiction or care of   SB1504 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1the Department, except that the benefits described in Section 25.46 must be used and conserved consistent with the provisions 3under Section 5.46.4    The Department shall set up and administer no-cost, 5interest-bearing accounts in appropriate financial 6institutions for children for whom the Department is legally 7responsible and who have been determined eligible for 8Veterans' Benefits, Social Security benefits, assistance 9allotments from the armed forces, court ordered payments, 10parental voluntary payments, Supplemental Security Income, 11Railroad Retirement payments, Black Lung benefits, or other 12miscellaneous payments. Interest earned by each account shall 13be credited to the account, unless disbursed in accordance 14with this subsection.15    In disbursing funds from children's accounts, the 16Department shall:17        (1) Establish standards in accordance with State and 18    federal laws for disbursing money from children's 19    accounts. In all circumstances, the Department's 20    Guardianship Administrator or the Guardianship 21    Administrator's designee must approve disbursements from 22    children's accounts. The Department shall be responsible 23    for keeping complete records of all disbursements for each 24    account for any purpose.25        (2) Calculate on a monthly basis the amounts paid from 26    State funds for the child's board and care, medical care   SB1504 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    not covered under Medicaid, and social services; and 2    utilize funds from the child's account, as covered by 3    regulation, to reimburse those costs. Monthly, 4    disbursements from all children's accounts, up to 1/12 of 5    $13,000,000, shall be deposited by the Department into the 6    General Revenue Fund and the balance over 1/12 of 7    $13,000,000 into the DCFS Children's Services Fund.8        (3) Maintain any balance remaining after reimbursing 9    for the child's costs of care, as specified in item (2). 10    The balance shall accumulate in accordance with relevant 11    State and federal laws and shall be disbursed to the child 12    or the child's guardian or to the issuing agency.13    (r) The Department shall promulgate regulations 14encouraging all adoption agencies to voluntarily forward to 15the Department or its agent names and addresses of all persons 16who have applied for and have been approved for adoption of a 17hard-to-place child or child with a disability and the names 18of such children who have not been placed for adoption. A list 19of such names and addresses shall be maintained by the 20Department or its agent, and coded lists which maintain the 21confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 22of the child shall be made available, without charge, to every 23adoption agency in the State to assist the agencies in placing 24such children for adoption. The Department may delegate to an 25agent its duty to maintain and make available such lists. The 26Department shall ensure that such agent maintains the   SB1504 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 2of the child.3    (s) The Department of Children and Family Services may 4establish and implement a program to reimburse caregivers 5licensed, certified, or otherwise approved by the Department 6of Children and Family Services for damages sustained by the 7caregivers as a result of the malicious or negligent acts of 8children placed by the Department, as well as providing third 9party coverage for such caregivers with regard to actions of 10children placed by the Department to other individuals. Such 11coverage will be secondary to the caregiver's liability 12insurance policy, if applicable. The program shall be funded 13through appropriations from the General Revenue Fund, 14specifically designated for such purposes.15    (t) The Department shall perform home studies and 16investigations and shall exercise supervision over visitation 17as ordered by a court pursuant to the Illinois Marriage and 18Dissolution of Marriage Act or the Adoption Act only if:19        (1) an order entered by an Illinois court specifically 20    directs the Department to perform such services; and21        (2) the court has ordered one or both of the parties to 22    the proceeding to reimburse the Department for its 23    reasonable costs for providing such services in accordance 24    with Department rules, or has determined that neither 25    party is financially able to pay.26    The Department shall provide written notification to the   SB1504 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1court of the specific arrangements for supervised visitation 2and projected monthly costs within 60 days of the court order. 3The Department shall send to the court information related to 4the costs incurred except in cases where the court has 5determined the parties are financially unable to pay. The 6court may order additional periodic reports as appropriate.7    (u) In addition to other information that must be 8provided, whenever the Department places a child with a 9prospective adoptive parent or parents, in a licensed foster 10home, group home, or child care institution, in a relative 11home, or in a certified relative caregiver home, the 12Department shall provide to the caregiver, appropriate 13facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or parents:14        (1) available detailed information concerning the 15    child's educational and health history, copies of 16    immunization records (including insurance and medical card 17    information), a history of the child's previous 18    placements, if any, and reasons for placement changes 19    excluding any information that identifies or reveals the 20    location of any previous caregiver or adoptive parents;21        (2) a copy of the child's portion of the client 22    service plan, including any visitation arrangement, and 23    all amendments or revisions to it as related to the child; 24    and25        (3) information containing details of the child's 26    individualized educational plan when the child is   SB1504 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    receiving special education services.2    The caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective 3adoptive parent or parents, shall be informed of any known 4social or behavioral information (including, but not limited 5to, criminal background, fire setting, perpetuation of sexual 6abuse, destructive behavior, and substance abuse) necessary to 7care for and safeguard the children to be placed or currently 8in the home or setting. The Department may prepare a written 9summary of the information required by this paragraph, which 10may be provided to the caregiver, appropriate facility staff, 11or prospective adoptive parent in advance of a placement. The 12caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive 13parent may review the supporting documents in the child's file 14in the presence of casework staff. In the case of an emergency 15placement, casework staff shall at least provide known 16information verbally, if necessary, and must subsequently 17provide the information in writing as required by this 18subsection. 19    The information described in this subsection shall be 20provided in writing. In the case of emergency placements when 21time does not allow prior review, preparation, and collection 22of written information, the Department shall provide such 23information as it becomes available. Within 10 business days 24after placement, the Department shall obtain from the 25caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive 26parent or parents a signed verification of receipt of the   SB1504 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1information provided. Within 10 business days after placement, 2the Department shall provide to the child's guardian ad litem 3a copy of the information provided to the caregiver, 4appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or 5parents. The information provided to the caregiver, 6appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or 7parents shall be reviewed and approved regarding accuracy at 8the supervisory level. 9    (u-5) Beginning July 1, 2025, certified relative caregiver 10homes under Section 3.4 of the Child Care Act of 1969 shall be 11eligible to receive foster care maintenance payments from the 12Department in an amount no less than payments made to licensed 13foster family homes. Beginning July 1, 2025, relative homes 14providing care to a child placed by the Department that are not 15a certified relative caregiver home under Section 3.4 of the 16Child Care Act of 1969 or a licensed foster family home shall 17be eligible to receive payments from the Department in an 18amount no less 90% of the payments made to licensed foster 19family homes and certified relative caregiver homes.20    (u-6) To assist relative and certified relative 21caregivers, no later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall 22adopt rules to implement a relative support program, as 23follows: 24        (1) For relative and certified relative caregivers, 25    the Department is authorized to reimburse or prepay 26    reasonable expenditures to remedy home conditions   SB1504 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    necessary to fulfill the home safety-related requirements 2    of relative caregiver homes. 3        (2) The Department may provide short-term emergency 4    funds to relative and certified relative caregiver homes 5    experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 6    stress associated with adding youth in care as new 7    household members. 8        (3) Consistent with federal law, the Department shall 9    include in any State Plan made in accordance with the 10    Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980, Titles 11    IV-E and XIX of the Social Security Act, and any other 12    applicable federal laws the provision of kinship navigator 13    program services. The Department shall apply for and 14    administer all relevant federal aid in accordance with 15    law. Federal funds acquired for the kinship navigator 16    program shall be used for the development, implementation, 17    and operation of kinship navigator program services. The 18    kinship navigator program services may provide 19    information, referral services, support, and assistance to 20    relative and certified relative caregivers of youth in 21    care to address their unique needs and challenges. Until 22    the Department is approved to receive federal funds for 23    these purposes, the Department shall publicly post on the 24    Department's website semi-annual updates regarding the 25    Department's progress in pursuing federal funding. 26    Whenever the Department publicly posts these updates on   SB1504 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    its website, the Department shall notify the General 2    Assembly through the General Assembly's designee. 3    (u-7) To support finding permanency for children through 4subsidized guardianship and adoption and to prevent disruption 5in guardianship and adoptive placements, the Department shall 6establish and maintain accessible subsidized guardianship and 7adoption support services for all children under 18 years of 8age placed in guardianship or adoption who, immediately 9preceding the guardianship or adoption, were in the custody or 10guardianship of the Department under Article II of the 11Juvenile Court Act of 1987.12    The Department shall establish and maintain a toll-free 13number to respond to requests from the public about its 14subsidized guardianship and adoption support services under 15this subsection and shall staff the toll-free number so that 16calls are answered on a timely basis, but in no event more than 17one business day after the receipt of a request. These 18requests from the public may be made anonymously. To meet this 19obligation, the Department may utilize the same toll-free 20number the Department operates to respond to post-adoption 21requests under subsection (b-5) of Section 18.9 of the 22Adoption Act. The Department shall publicize information about 23the Department's subsidized guardianship support services and 24toll-free number as follows:25        (1) it shall post information on the Department's 26    website;  SB1504 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (2) it shall provide the information to every licensed 2    child welfare agency and any entity providing subsidized 3    guardianship support services in Illinois courts;4        (3) it shall reference such information in the 5    materials the Department provides to caregivers pursuing 6    subsidized guardianship to inform them of their rights and 7    responsibilities under the Child Care Act of 1969 and this 8    Act;9        (4) it shall provide the information, including the 10    Department's Post Adoption and Guardianship Services 11    booklet, to eligible caregivers as part of its 12    guardianship training and at the time they are presented 13    with the Permanency Commitment form;14        (5) it shall include, in each annual notification 15    letter mailed to subsidized guardians, a short, 2-sided 16    flier or news bulletin in plain language that describes 17    access to post-guardianship services, how to access 18    services under the Family Support Program, formerly known 19    as the Individual Care Grant Program, the webpage address 20    to the Post Adoption and Guardianship Services booklet, 21    information on how to request that a copy of the booklet be 22    mailed; and23        (6) it shall ensure that kinship navigator programs of 24    this State, when established, have this information to 25    include in materials the programs provide to caregivers.26    No later than July 1, 2026, the Department shall provide a   SB1504 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1mechanism for the public to make information requests by 2electronic means. 3    The Department shall review and update annually all 4information relating to its subsidized guardianship support 5services, including its Post Adoption and Guardianship 6Services booklet, to include updated information on Family 7Support Program services eligibility and subsidized 8guardianship support services that are available through the 9medical assistance program established under Article V of the 10Illinois Public Aid Code or any other State program for mental 11health services. The Department and the Department of 12Healthcare and Family Services shall coordinate their efforts 13in the development of these resources.14    Every licensed child welfare agency and any entity 15providing kinship navigator programs funded by the Department 16shall provide the Department's website address and link to the 17Department's subsidized guardianship support services 18information set forth in subsection (d), including the 19Department's toll-free number, to every relative who is or 20will be providing guardianship placement for a child placed by 21the Department.22    (v) The Department shall access criminal history record 23information as defined in the Illinois Uniform Conviction 24Information Act and information maintained in the adjudicatory 25and dispositional record system as defined in Section 2605-355 26of the Illinois State Police Law if the Department determines   SB1504 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1the information is necessary to perform its duties under the 2Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, the Child Care Act 3of 1969, and the Children and Family Services Act. The 4Department shall provide for interactive computerized 5communication and processing equipment that permits direct 6on-line communication with the Illinois State Police's central 7criminal history data repository. The Department shall comply 8with all certification requirements and provide certified 9operators who have been trained by personnel from the Illinois 10State Police. In addition, one Office of the Inspector General 11investigator shall have training in the use of the criminal 12history information access system and have access to the 13terminal. The Department of Children and Family Services and 14its employees shall abide by rules and regulations established 15by the Illinois State Police relating to the access and 16dissemination of this information.17    (v-1) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 18with a foster or adoptive parent, the Department shall conduct 19a criminal records background check of the prospective foster 20or adoptive parent, including fingerprint-based checks of 21national crime information databases. Final approval for 22placement shall not be granted if the record check reveals a 23felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, for spousal 24abuse, for a crime against children, or for a crime involving 25violence, including rape, sexual assault, or homicide, but not 26including other physical assault or battery, or if there is a   SB1504 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1felony conviction for physical assault, battery, or a 2drug-related offense committed within the past 5 years.3    (v-2) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 4with a foster or adoptive parent, the Department shall check 5its child abuse and neglect registry for information 6concerning prospective foster and adoptive parents, and any 7adult living in the home. If any prospective foster or 8adoptive parent or other adult living in the home has resided 9in another state in the preceding 5 years, the Department 10shall request a check of that other state's child abuse and 11neglect registry. 12    (v-3) Prior to the final approval of final placement of a 13related child in a certified relative caregiver home as 14defined in Section 2.37 of the Child Care Act of 1969, the 15Department shall ensure that the background screening meets 16the standards required under subsection (c) of Section 3.4 of 17the Child Care Act of 1969. 18    (v-4) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 19with a relative, as defined in Section 4d of this Act, who is 20not a licensed foster parent, has declined to seek approval to 21be a certified relative caregiver, or was denied approval as a 22certified relative caregiver, the Department shall: 23        (i) check the child abuse and neglect registry for 24    information concerning the prospective relative caregiver 25    and any other adult living in the home. If any prospective 26    relative caregiver or other adult living in the home has   SB1504 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    resided in another state in the preceding 5 years, the 2    Department shall request a check of that other state's 3    child abuse and neglect registry; and 4        (ii) conduct a criminal records background check of 5    the prospective relative caregiver and all other adults 6    living in the home, including fingerprint-based checks of 7    national crime information databases. Final approval for 8    placement shall not be granted if the record check reveals 9    a felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, for 10    spousal abuse, for a crime against children, or for a 11    crime involving violence, including rape, sexual assault, 12    or homicide, but not including other physical assault or 13    battery, or if there is a felony conviction for physical 14    assault, battery, or a drug-related offense committed 15    within the past 5 years; provided however, that the 16    Department is empowered to grant a waiver as the 17    Department may provide by rule, and the Department 18    approves the request for the waiver based on a 19    comprehensive evaluation of the caregiver and household 20    members and the conditions relating to the safety of the 21    placement.22    No later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall adopt 23rules or revise existing rules to effectuate the changes made 24to this subsection (v-4). The rules shall outline the 25essential elements of each form used in the implementation and 26enforcement of the provisions of this amendatory Act of the   SB1504 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1103rd General Assembly. 2    (w) (Blank).3    (x) The Department shall conduct annual credit history 4checks to determine the financial history of children placed 5under its guardianship pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 61987. The Department shall conduct such credit checks starting 7when a youth in care turns 12 years old and each year 8thereafter for the duration of the guardianship as terminated 9pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. The Department 10shall determine if financial exploitation of the child's 11personal information has occurred. If financial exploitation 12appears to have taken place or is presently ongoing, the 13Department shall notify the proper law enforcement agency, the 14proper State's Attorney, or the Attorney General.15    (y) Beginning on July 22, 2010 (the effective date of 16Public Act 96-1189), a child with a disability who receives 17residential and educational services from the Department shall 18be eligible to receive transition services in accordance with 19Article 14 of the School Code from the age of 14.5 through age 2021, inclusive, notwithstanding the child's residential 21services arrangement. For purposes of this subsection, "child 22with a disability" means a child with a disability as defined 23by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 24Improvement Act of 2004. 25    (z) The Department shall access criminal history record 26information as defined as "background information" in this   SB1504 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1subsection and criminal history record information as defined 2in the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act for each 3Department employee or Department applicant. Each Department 4employee or Department applicant shall submit the employee's 5or applicant's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in 6the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. 7These fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint 8records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police 9and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history 10records databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a 11fee for conducting the criminal history record check, which 12shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund and 13shall not exceed the actual cost of the record check. The 14Illinois State Police shall furnish, pursuant to positive 15identification, all Illinois conviction information to the 16Department of Children and Family Services. 17    For purposes of this subsection: 18    "Background information" means all of the following: 19        (i) Upon the request of the Department of Children and 20    Family Services, conviction information obtained from the 21    Illinois State Police as a result of a fingerprint-based 22    criminal history records check of the Illinois criminal 23    history records database and the Federal Bureau of 24    Investigation criminal history records database concerning 25    a Department employee or Department applicant. 26        (ii) Information obtained by the Department of   SB1504 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 2    the Illinois State Police's Sex Offender Database, as 3    authorized by Section 120 of the Sex Offender Community 4    Notification Law, concerning a Department employee or 5    Department applicant. 6        (iii) Information obtained by the Department of 7    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 8    the Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System (CANTS) 9    operated and maintained by the Department. 10    "Department employee" means a full-time or temporary 11employee coded or certified within the State of Illinois 12Personnel System. 13    "Department applicant" means an individual who has 14conditional Department full-time or part-time work, a 15contractor, an individual used to replace or supplement staff, 16an academic intern, a volunteer in Department offices or on 17Department contracts, a work-study student, an individual or 18entity licensed by the Department, or an unlicensed service 19provider who works as a condition of a contract or an agreement 20and whose work may bring the unlicensed service provider into 21contact with Department clients or client records. 22(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-1014, eff. 5-27-22; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-50, eff. 241-1-24; 103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1061, 25eff. 7-1-25.)   SB1504 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    (20 ILCS 505/35.10)2    Sec. 35.10. Successful transitions to and documents 3necessary for adult living. Documents necessary for adult 4living. 5    (a) The Department shall make reasonable efforts to 6develop an age and developmentally appropriate individualized 7youth-driven transition plan for each youth in care aged 15 8and over to help such youth develop and strengthen those life 9skills that lead to successful adult living. As applicable, 10based on the minor's age and developmental appropriateness, 11the youth-driven transition plan shall address the following 12areas:13        (1) assessment and development of life skills; 14        (2) education;15        (3) post high school goals;16        (4) driver's education;17        (5) participation in extracurricular activities;18        (6) internships;19        (7) employment;20        (8) housing;21        (9) mental and physical health and well-being;22        (10) financial stability;23        (11) connections to supportive adults and peers;24        (12) transition to adult services;25        (13) documents necessary for adult living as provided 26    in subsection (b); and  SB1504 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (14) childcare and parenting supports.2    The Department shall include the youth-driven transition 3plan in the youth's service plan. The Department shall make 4reasonable efforts to assist the youth in accomplishing the 5plan, to develop strategies to resolve barriers, and to ensure 6the youth is aware of any post-case closure supports and 7services and how to access such supports and services. 8    (b) The Department shall assist a youth in care in 9identifying and obtaining documents necessary to function as 10an independent adult prior to the closure of the youth's case 11to terminate wardship as provided in Section 2-31 of the 12Juvenile Court Act of 1987. These necessary documents shall 13include, but not be limited to, any of the following:14        (1) State identification card or driver's license.15        (2) Social Security card.16        (3) Medical records, including, but not limited to, 17    health passport, dental records, immunization records, 18    name and contact information for all current medical, 19    dental, and mental health providers, and a signed 20    certification that the Department provided the youth with 21    education on executing a healthcare power of attorney.22        (4) Medicaid card or other health eligibility 23    documentation.24        (5) Certified copy of birth certificate.25        (6) Any applicable religious documents.26        (7) Voter registration card.  SB1504 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (8) Immigration, citizenship, or naturalization 2    documentation, if applicable.3        (9) Death certificates of parents, if applicable.4        (10) Life book or compilation of personal history and 5    photographs.6        (11) List of known relatives and persons willing to 7    provide supports to the youth with relationships, 8    addresses, telephone numbers, and other contact 9    information, with the permission of the involved relative 10    or supportive person.11        (12) Resume.12        (13) Educational records, including list of schools 13    attended, and transcript, high school diploma, or State of 14    Illinois High School Diploma.15        (14) List of placements while in care.16        (15) List of community resources with referral 17    information, including the Midwest Adoption Center for 18    search and reunion services for former youth in care, 19    whether or not they were adopted, and the Illinois Chapter 20    of Foster Care Alumni of America.21        (16) All documents necessary to complete a Free 22    Application for Federal Student Aid form, if applicable, 23    or an application for State financial aid. 24        (17) If applicable, a final accounting of the account 25    maintained on behalf of the youth as provided under 26    Section 5.46.   SB1504 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1If a court determines that a youth in care no longer requires 2wardship of the court and orders the wardship terminated and 3all proceedings under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 4respecting the youth in care finally closed and discharged, 5the Department shall ensure that the youth in care receives a 6copy of the court's order. 7(Source: P.A. 102-70, eff. 1-1-22; 102-1014, eff. 5-27-22; 8102-1100, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 9    Section 10. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 10changing Sections 2-28, 2-33, and 5-745 and by adding Section 112-28.2 as follows: 12    (705 ILCS 405/2-28)13    Sec. 2-28. Court review. 14    (1) The court may require any legal custodian or guardian 15of the person appointed under this Act to report periodically 16to the court or may cite the legal custodian or guardian into 17court and require the legal custodian, guardian, or the legal 18custodian's or guardian's agency to make a full and accurate 19report of the doings of the legal custodian, guardian, or 20agency on behalf of the minor. The custodian or guardian, 21within 10 days after such citation, or earlier if the court 22determines it to be necessary to protect the health, safety, 23or welfare of the minor, shall make the report, either in 24writing verified by affidavit or orally under oath in open   SB1504 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1court, or otherwise as the court directs. Upon the hearing of 2the report the court may remove the custodian or guardian and 3appoint another in the custodian's or guardian's stead or 4restore the minor to the custody of the minor's parents or 5former guardian or custodian. However, custody of the minor 6shall not be restored to any parent, guardian, or legal 7custodian in any case in which the minor is found to be 8neglected or abused under Section 2-3 or dependent under 9Section 2-4 of this Act, unless the minor can be cared for at 10home without endangering the minor's health or safety and it 11is in the best interests of the minor, and if such neglect, 12abuse, or dependency is found by the court under paragraph (1) 13of Section 2-21 of this Act to have come about due to the acts 14or omissions or both of such parent, guardian, or legal 15custodian, until such time as an investigation is made as 16provided in paragraph (5) and a hearing is held on the issue of 17the fitness of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian to 18care for the minor and the court enters an order that such 19parent, guardian, or legal custodian is fit to care for the 20minor.21    (1.5) The public agency that is the custodian or guardian 22of the minor shall file a written report with the court no 23later than 15 days after a minor in the agency's care remains:24        (1) in a shelter placement beyond 30 days;25        (2) in a psychiatric hospital past the time when the 26    minor is clinically ready for discharge or beyond medical   SB1504 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    necessity for the minor's health; or2        (3) in a detention center or Department of Juvenile 3    Justice facility solely because the public agency cannot 4    find an appropriate placement for the minor.5    The report shall explain the steps the agency is taking to 6ensure the minor is placed appropriately, how the minor's 7needs are being met in the minor's shelter placement, and if a 8future placement has been identified by the Department, why 9the anticipated placement is appropriate for the needs of the 10minor and the anticipated placement date. 11    (1.6) Within 30 days after placing a child in its care in a 12qualified residential treatment program, as defined by the 13federal Social Security Act, the Department of Children and 14Family Services shall prepare a written report for filing with 15the court and send copies of the report to all parties. Within 1620 days of the filing of the report, or as soon thereafter as 17the court's schedule allows but not more than 60 days from the 18date of placement, the court shall hold a hearing to consider 19the Department's report and determine whether placement of the 20child in a qualified residential treatment program provides 21the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child 22in the least restrictive environment and if the placement is 23consistent with the short-term and long-term goals for the 24child, as specified in the permanency plan for the child. The 25court shall approve or disapprove the placement. If 26applicable, the requirements of Sections 2-27.1 and 2-27.2   SB1504 Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1must also be met. The Department's written report and the 2court's written determination shall be included in and made 3part of the case plan for the child. If the child remains 4placed in a qualified residential treatment program, the 5Department shall submit evidence at each status and permanency 6hearing: 7        (A) demonstrating that on-going assessment of the 8    strengths and needs of the child continues to support the 9    determination that the child's needs cannot be met through 10    placement in a foster family home, that the placement 11    provides the most effective and appropriate level of care 12    for the child in the least restrictive, appropriate 13    environment, and that the placement is consistent with the 14    short-term and long-term permanency goal for the child, as 15    specified in the permanency plan for the child; 16        (B) documenting the specific treatment or service 17    needs that should be met for the child in the placement and 18    the length of time the child is expected to need the 19    treatment or services; 20        (C) detailing the efforts made by the agency to 21    prepare the child to return home or to be placed with a fit 22    and willing relative, a legal guardian, or an adoptive 23    parent, or in a foster family home; and 24        (D) beginning July 1, 2025, documenting the 25    Department's efforts regarding ongoing family finding and 26    relative engagement required under Section 2-27.3; and .   SB1504 Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (E) detailing efforts to ensure the minor is engaged 2    in age and developmentally appropriate activities to 3    develop life skills, which may include extracurricular 4    activities, coaching by caregivers, or instruction in 5    individual or group settings. For minors who have 6    participated in life skills assessments, the results of 7    such assessments and how the minor's identified needs are 8    being addressed. 9    (2) The first permanency hearing shall be conducted by the 10judge. Subsequent permanency hearings may be heard by a judge 11or by hearing officers appointed or approved by the court in 12the manner set forth in Section 2-28.1 of this Act. The initial 13hearing shall be held (a) within 12 months from the date 14temporary custody was taken, regardless of whether an 15adjudication or dispositional hearing has been completed 16within that time frame, (b) if the parental rights of both 17parents have been terminated in accordance with the procedure 18described in subsection (5) of Section 2-21, within 30 days of 19the order for termination of parental rights and appointment 20of a guardian with power to consent to adoption, or (c) in 21accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2-13.1. Subsequent 22permanency hearings shall be held every 6 months or more 23frequently if necessary in the court's determination following 24the initial permanency hearing, in accordance with the 25standards set forth in this Section, until the court 26determines that the plan and goal have been achieved. Once the   SB1504 Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1plan and goal have been achieved, if the minor remains in 2substitute care, the case shall be reviewed at least every 6 3months thereafter, subject to the provisions of this Section, 4unless the minor is placed in the guardianship of a suitable 5relative or other person and the court determines that further 6monitoring by the court does not further the health, safety, 7or best interest of the child and that this is a stable 8permanent placement. The permanency hearings must occur within 9the time frames set forth in this subsection and may not be 10delayed in anticipation of a report from any source or due to 11the agency's failure to timely file its written report (this 12written report means the one required under the next paragraph 13and does not mean the service plan also referred to in that 14paragraph).15    The public agency that is the custodian or guardian of the 16minor, or another agency responsible for the minor's care, 17shall ensure that all parties to the permanency hearings are 18provided a copy of the most recent service plan prepared 19within the prior 6 months at least 14 days in advance of the 20hearing. If not contained in the agency's service plan, the 21agency shall also include a report setting forth the 22following:23        (A) any special physical, psychological, educational, 24    medical, emotional, or other needs of the minor or the 25    minor's family that are relevant to a permanency or 26    placement determination, and for any minor age 16 or over,   SB1504 Enrolled- 81 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    a written description of the programs and services that 2    will enable the minor to prepare for independent living; 3        (B) beginning July 1, 2025, a written description of 4    ongoing family finding and relative engagement efforts in 5    accordance with the requirements under Section 2-27.3 the 6    agency has undertaken since the most recent report to the 7    court to plan for the emotional and legal permanency of 8    the minor;9        (C) whether a minor is placed in a licensed child care 10    facility under a corrective plan by the Department due to 11    concerns impacting the minor's safety and well-being. The 12    report shall explain the steps the Department is taking to 13    ensure the safety and well-being of the minor and that the 14    minor's needs are met in the facility;15        (D) detail regarding what progress or lack of progress 16    the parent has made in correcting the conditions requiring 17    the child to be in care; whether the child can be returned 18    home without jeopardizing the child's health, safety, and 19    welfare, what permanency goal is recommended to be in the 20    best interests of the child, and the reasons for the 21    recommendation. If a permanency goal under paragraph (A), 22    (B), or (B-1) of subsection (2.3) have been deemed 23    inappropriate and not in the minor's best interest, the 24    report must include the following information:25            (i) confirmation that the caseworker has discussed 26        the permanency options and subsidies available for   SB1504 Enrolled- 82 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        guardianship and adoption with the minor's caregivers, 2        the minor's parents, as appropriate, and has discussed 3        the available permanency options with the minor in an 4        age-appropriate manner;5            (ii) confirmation that the caseworker has 6        discussed with the minor's caregivers, the minor's 7        parents, as appropriate, and the minor as 8        age-appropriate, the distinctions between guardianship 9        and adoption, including, but not limited to, that 10        guardianship does not require termination of the 11        parent's rights or the consent of the parent;12            (iii) a description of the stated preferences and 13        concerns, if any, the minor, the parent as 14        appropriate, and the caregiver expressed relating to 15        the options of guardianship and adoption, and the 16        reasons for the preferences;17            (iv) if the minor is not currently in a placement 18        that will provide permanency, identification of all 19        persons presently willing and able to provide 20        permanency to the minor through either guardianship or 21        adoption, and beginning July 1, 2025, if none are 22        available, a description of the efforts made in 23        accordance with Section 2-27.3; and24            (v) state the recommended permanency goal, why 25        that goal is recommended, and why the other potential 26        goals were not recommended.   SB1504 Enrolled- 83 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    The caseworker must appear and testify at the permanency 2hearing. If a permanency hearing has not previously been 3scheduled by the court, the moving party shall move for the 4setting of a permanency hearing and the entry of an order 5within the time frames set forth in this subsection.6    (2.3) At the permanency hearing, the court shall determine 7the permanency goal of the child. The court shall set one of 8the following permanency goals:9        (A) The minor will be returned home by a specific date 10    within 5 months.11        (B) The minor will be in short-term care with a 12    continued goal to return home within a period not to 13    exceed one year, where the progress of the parent or 14    parents is substantial giving particular consideration to 15    the age and individual needs of the minor.16        (B-1) The minor will be in short-term care with a 17    continued goal to return home pending a status hearing. 18    When the court finds that a parent has not made reasonable 19    efforts or reasonable progress to date, the court shall 20    identify what actions the parent and the Department must 21    take in order to justify a finding of reasonable efforts 22    or reasonable progress and shall set a status hearing to 23    be held not earlier than 9 months from the date of 24    adjudication nor later than 11 months from the date of 25    adjudication during which the parent's progress will again 26    be reviewed.  SB1504 Enrolled- 84 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        If the court has determined that goals (A), (B), and 2    (B-1) are not appropriate and not in the minor's best 3    interest, the court may select one of the following goals: 4    (C), (D), (E), (F), or (G) for the minor as appropriate and 5    based on the best interests of the minor. The court shall 6    determine the appropriate goal for the minor based on best 7    interest factors and any considerations outlined in that 8    goal. 9        (C) The guardianship of the minor shall be transferred 10    to an individual or couple on a permanent basis. Prior to 11    changing the goal to guardianship, the court shall 12    consider the following: 13            (i) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 14        guardianship with the caregiver and what preference, 15        if any, the caregiver has as to the permanency goal;16            (ii) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 17        guardianship with the minor, as age-appropriate, and 18        what preference, if any, the minor has as to the 19        permanency goal;20            (iii) whether the minor is of sufficient age to 21        remember the minor's parents and if the child values 22        this familial identity;23            (iv) whether the minor is placed with a relative, 24        and beginning July 1, 2025, whether the minor is 25        placed in a relative home as defined in Section 4d of 26        the Children and Family Services Act or in a certified   SB1504 Enrolled- 85 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        relative caregiver home as defined in Section 2.36 of 2        the Child Care Act of 1969; and3            (v) whether the parent or parents have been 4        informed about guardianship and adoption, and, if 5        appropriate, what preferences, if any, the parent or 6        parents have as to the permanency goal. 7        (D) The minor will be in substitute care pending court 8    determination on termination of parental rights. Prior to 9    changing the goal to substitute care pending court 10    determination on termination of parental rights, the court 11    shall consider the following: 12            (i) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 13        guardianship with the caregiver and what preference, 14        if any, the caregiver has as to the permanency goal;15            (ii) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 16        guardianship with the minor, as age-appropriate, and 17        what preference, if any, the minor has as to the 18        permanency goal;19            (iii) whether the minor is of sufficient age to 20        remember the minor's parents and if the child values 21        this familial identity;22            (iv) whether the minor is placed with a relative, 23        and beginning July 1, 2025, whether the minor is 24        placed in a relative home as defined in Section 4d of 25        the Children and Family Services Act, in a certified 26        relative caregiver home as defined in Section 2.36 of   SB1504 Enrolled- 86 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        the Child Care Act of 1969;2            (v) whether the minor is already placed in a 3        pre-adoptive home, and if not, whether such a home has 4        been identified; and5            (vi) whether the parent or parents have been 6        informed about guardianship and adoption, and, if 7        appropriate, what preferences, if any, the parent or 8        parents have as to the permanency goal.9        (E) Adoption, provided that parental rights have been 10    terminated or relinquished.11        (F) Provided that permanency goals (A) through (E) 12    have been deemed inappropriate and not in the minor's best 13    interests, the minor over age 15 will be in substitute 14    care pending independence. In selecting this permanency 15    goal, the Department of Children and Family Services may 16    provide services to enable reunification and to strengthen 17    the minor's connections with family, fictive kin, and 18    other responsible adults, provided the services are in the 19    minor's best interest. The services shall be documented in 20    the service plan. 21        (G) The minor will be in substitute care because the 22    minor cannot be provided for in a home environment due to 23    developmental disabilities or mental illness or because 24    the minor is a danger to self or others, provided that 25    goals (A) through (E) have been deemed inappropriate and 26    not in the child's best interests.  SB1504 Enrolled- 87 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    In selecting any permanency goal, the court shall indicate 2in writing the reasons the goal was selected and why the 3preceding goals were deemed inappropriate and not in the 4child's best interest. Where the court has selected a 5permanency goal other than (A), (B), or (B-1), the Department 6of Children and Family Services shall not provide further 7reunification services, except as provided in paragraph (F) of 8this subsection (2.3), but shall provide services consistent 9with the goal selected.10        (H) Notwithstanding any other provision in this 11    Section, the court may select the goal of continuing 12    foster care as a permanency goal if: 13            (1) The Department of Children and Family Services 14        has custody and guardianship of the minor; 15            (2) The court has deemed all other permanency 16        goals inappropriate based on the child's best 17        interest; 18            (3) The court has found compelling reasons, based 19        on written documentation reviewed by the court, to 20        place the minor in continuing foster care. Compelling 21        reasons include: 22                (a) the child does not wish to be adopted or to 23            be placed in the guardianship of the minor's 24            relative, certified relative caregiver, or foster 25            care placement; 26                (b) the child exhibits an extreme level of   SB1504 Enrolled- 88 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1            need such that the removal of the child from the 2            minor's placement would be detrimental to the 3            child; or 4                (c) the child who is the subject of the 5            permanency hearing has existing close and strong 6            bonds with a sibling, and achievement of another 7            permanency goal would substantially interfere with 8            the subject child's sibling relationship, taking 9            into consideration the nature and extent of the 10            relationship, and whether ongoing contact is in 11            the subject child's best interest, including 12            long-term emotional interest, as compared with the 13            legal and emotional benefit of permanence; 14            (4) The child has lived with the relative, 15        certified relative caregiver, or foster parent for at 16        least one year; and 17            (5) The relative, certified relative caregiver, or 18        foster parent currently caring for the child is 19        willing and capable of providing the child with a 20        stable and permanent environment. 21    (2.4) The court shall set a permanency goal that is in the 22best interest of the child. In determining that goal, the 23court shall consult with the minor in an age-appropriate 24manner regarding the proposed permanency or transition plan 25for the minor. The court's determination shall include the 26following factors:  SB1504 Enrolled- 89 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (A) Age of the child.2        (B) Options available for permanence, including both 3    out-of-state and in-state placement options.4        (C) Current placement of the child and the intent of 5    the family regarding subsidized guardianship and adoption.6        (D) Emotional, physical, and mental status or 7    condition of the child.8        (E) Types of services previously offered and whether 9    or not the services were successful and, if not 10    successful, the reasons the services failed.11        (F) Availability of services currently needed and 12    whether the services exist.13        (G) Status of siblings of the minor.14        (H) If the minor is not currently in a placement 15    likely to achieve permanency, whether there is an 16    identified and willing potential permanent caregiver for 17    the minor, and if so, that potential permanent caregiver's 18    intent regarding guardianship and adoption. 19    The court shall consider (i) the permanency goal contained 20in the service plan, (ii) the appropriateness of the services 21contained in the plan and whether those services have been 22provided, (iii) whether reasonable efforts have been made by 23all the parties to the service plan to achieve the goal, and 24(iv) whether the plan and goal have been achieved. All 25evidence relevant to determining these questions, including 26oral and written reports, may be admitted and may be relied on   SB1504 Enrolled- 90 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1to the extent of their probative value.2    The court shall make findings as to whether, in violation 3of Section 8.2 of the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 4Act, any portion of the service plan compels a child or parent 5to engage in any activity or refrain from any activity that is 6not reasonably related to remedying a condition or conditions 7that gave rise or which could give rise to any finding of child 8abuse or neglect. The services contained in the service plan 9shall include services reasonably related to remedy the 10conditions that gave rise to removal of the child from the home 11of the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian or that 12the court has found must be remedied prior to returning the 13child home. Any tasks the court requires of the parents, 14guardian, or legal custodian or child prior to returning the 15child home must be reasonably related to remedying a condition 16or conditions that gave rise to or which could give rise to any 17finding of child abuse or neglect. 18    If the permanency goal is to return home, the court shall 19make findings that identify any problems that are causing 20continued placement of the children away from the home and 21identify what outcomes would be considered a resolution to 22these problems. The court shall explain to the parents that 23these findings are based on the information that the court has 24at that time and may be revised, should additional evidence be 25presented to the court. 26    The court shall review the Sibling Contact Support Plan   SB1504 Enrolled- 91 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1developed or modified under subsection (f) of Section 7.4 of 2the Children and Family Services Act, if applicable. If the 3Department has not convened a meeting to develop or modify a 4Sibling Contact Support Plan, or if the court finds that the 5existing Plan is not in the child's best interest, the court 6may enter an order requiring the Department to develop, 7modify, or implement a Sibling Contact Support Plan, or order 8mediation. 9    The court shall review the Department's efforts to provide 10the minor with age and developmentally appropriate life 11skills. If the court finds the Department's efforts are not in 12the minor's best interest, the court may enter an order 13requiring the Department to develop, modify, or implement the 14service plan to develop the minor's life skills in an age and 15developmentally appropriate manner. 16    Beginning July 1, 2025, the court shall review the Ongoing 17Family Finding and Relative Engagement Plan required under 18Section 2-27.3. If the court finds that the plan is not in the 19minor's best interest, the court shall enter specific factual 20findings and order the Department to modify the plan 21consistent with the court's findings. 22    If the goal has been achieved, the court shall enter 23orders that are necessary to conform the minor's legal custody 24and status to those findings.25    If, after receiving evidence, the court determines that 26the services contained in the plan are not reasonably   SB1504 Enrolled- 92 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1calculated to facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, 2the court shall put in writing the factual basis supporting 3the determination and enter specific findings based on the 4evidence. The court also shall enter an order for the 5Department to develop and implement a new service plan or to 6implement changes to the current service plan consistent with 7the court's findings. The new service plan shall be filed with 8the court and served on all parties within 45 days of the date 9of the order. The court shall continue the matter until the new 10service plan is filed. Except as authorized by subsection 11(2.5) of this Section and as otherwise specifically authorized 12by law, the court is not empowered under this Section to order 13specific placements, specific services, or specific service 14providers to be included in the service plan.15    A guardian or custodian appointed by the court pursuant to 16this Act shall file updated case plans with the court every 6 17months.18    Rights of wards of the court under this Act are 19enforceable against any public agency by complaints for relief 20by mandamus filed in any proceedings brought under this Act.21    (2.5) If, after reviewing the evidence, including evidence 22from the Department, the court determines that the minor's 23current or planned placement is not necessary or appropriate 24to facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, the court 25shall put in writing the factual basis supporting its 26determination and enter specific findings based on the   SB1504 Enrolled- 93 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1evidence. If the court finds that the minor's current or 2planned placement is not necessary or appropriate, the court 3may enter an order directing the Department to implement a 4recommendation by the minor's treating clinician or a 5clinician contracted by the Department to evaluate the minor 6or a recommendation made by the Department. If the Department 7places a minor in a placement under an order entered under this 8subsection (2.5), the Department has the authority to remove 9the minor from that placement when a change in circumstances 10necessitates the removal to protect the minor's health, 11safety, and best interest. If the Department determines 12removal is necessary, the Department shall notify the parties 13of the planned placement change in writing no later than 10 14days prior to the implementation of its determination unless 15remaining in the placement poses an imminent risk of harm to 16the minor, in which case the Department shall notify the 17parties of the placement change in writing immediately 18following the implementation of its decision. The Department 19shall notify others of the decision to change the minor's 20placement as required by Department rule. 21    (3) Following the permanency hearing, the court shall 22enter a written order that includes the determinations 23required under subsections (2) and (2.3) of this Section and 24sets forth the following:25        (a) The future status of the minor, including the 26    permanency goal, and any order necessary to conform the   SB1504 Enrolled- 94 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    minor's legal custody and status to such determination; or2        (b) If the permanency goal of the minor cannot be 3    achieved immediately, the specific reasons for continuing 4    the minor in the care of the Department of Children and 5    Family Services or other agency for short-term placement, 6    and the following determinations:7            (i) (Blank).8            (ii) Whether the services required by the court 9        and by any service plan prepared within the prior 6 10        months have been provided and (A) if so, whether the 11        services were reasonably calculated to facilitate the 12        achievement of the permanency goal or (B) if not 13        provided, why the services were not provided.14            (iii) Whether the minor's current or planned 15        placement is necessary, and appropriate to the plan 16        and goal, recognizing the right of minors to the least 17        restrictive (most family-like) setting available and 18        in close proximity to the parents' home consistent 19        with the health, safety, best interest, and special 20        needs of the minor and, if the minor is placed 21        out-of-state, whether the out-of-state placement 22        continues to be appropriate and consistent with the 23        health, safety, and best interest of the minor.24            (iv) (Blank).25            (v) (Blank).26    If the court sets a permanency goal of independence or if   SB1504 Enrolled- 95 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1the minor is 17 years of age or older, the court shall schedule 2a Successful Transition to Adulthood Review hearing in 3accordance with Section 2-28.2. 4    (4) The minor or any person interested in the minor may 5apply to the court for a change in custody of the minor and the 6appointment of a new custodian or guardian of the person or for 7the restoration of the minor to the custody of the minor's 8parents or former guardian or custodian.9    When return home is not selected as the permanency goal:10        (a) The Department, the minor, or the current foster 11    parent or relative caregiver seeking private guardianship 12    may file a motion for private guardianship of the minor. 13    Appointment of a guardian under this Section requires 14    approval of the court.15        (b) The State's Attorney may file a motion to 16    terminate parental rights of any parent who has failed to 17    make reasonable efforts to correct the conditions which 18    led to the removal of the child or reasonable progress 19    toward the return of the child, as defined in subdivision 20    (D)(m) of Section 1 of the Adoption Act or for whom any 21    other unfitness ground for terminating parental rights as 22    defined in subdivision (D) of Section 1 of the Adoption 23    Act exists.24        When parental rights have been terminated for a 25    minimum of 3 years and the child who is the subject of the 26    permanency hearing is 13 years old or older and is not   SB1504 Enrolled- 96 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    currently placed in a placement likely to achieve 2    permanency, the Department of Children and Family Services 3    shall make reasonable efforts to locate parents whose 4    rights have been terminated, except when the Court 5    determines that those efforts would be futile or 6    inconsistent with the subject child's best interests. The 7    Department of Children and Family Services shall assess 8    the appropriateness of the parent whose rights have been 9    terminated, and shall, as appropriate, foster and support 10    connections between the parent whose rights have been 11    terminated and the youth. The Department of Children and 12    Family Services shall document its determinations and 13    efforts to foster connections in the child's case plan. 14    Custody of the minor shall not be restored to any parent, 15guardian, or legal custodian in any case in which the minor is 16found to be neglected or abused under Section 2-3 or dependent 17under Section 2-4 of this Act, unless the minor can be cared 18for at home without endangering the minor's health or safety 19and it is in the best interest of the minor, and if such 20neglect, abuse, or dependency is found by the court under 21paragraph (1) of Section 2-21 of this Act to have come about 22due to the acts or omissions or both of such parent, guardian, 23or legal custodian, until such time as an investigation is 24made as provided in paragraph (5) and a hearing is held on the 25issue of the health, safety, and best interest of the minor and 26the fitness of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian to   SB1504 Enrolled- 97 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1care for the minor and the court enters an order that such 2parent, guardian, or legal custodian is fit to care for the 3minor. If a motion is filed to modify or vacate a private 4guardianship order and return the child to a parent, guardian, 5or legal custodian, the court may order the Department of 6Children and Family Services to assess the minor's current and 7proposed living arrangements and to provide ongoing monitoring 8of the health, safety, and best interest of the minor during 9the pendency of the motion to assist the court in making that 10determination. In the event that the minor has attained 18 11years of age and the guardian or custodian petitions the court 12for an order terminating the minor's guardianship or custody, 13guardianship or custody shall terminate automatically 30 days 14after the receipt of the petition unless the court orders 15otherwise. No legal custodian or guardian of the person may be 16removed without the legal custodian's or guardian's consent 17until given notice and an opportunity to be heard by the court.18    When the court orders a child restored to the custody of 19the parent or parents, the court shall order the parent or 20parents to cooperate with the Department of Children and 21Family Services and comply with the terms of an after-care 22plan, or risk the loss of custody of the child and possible 23termination of their parental rights. The court may also enter 24an order of protective supervision in accordance with Section 252-24.26    If the minor is being restored to the custody of a parent,   SB1504 Enrolled- 98 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1legal custodian, or guardian who lives outside of Illinois, 2and an Interstate Compact has been requested and refused, the 3court may order the Department of Children and Family Services 4to arrange for an assessment of the minor's proposed living 5arrangement and for ongoing monitoring of the health, safety, 6and best interest of the minor and compliance with any order of 7protective supervision entered in accordance with Section 82-24. 9    (5) Whenever a parent, guardian, or legal custodian files 10a motion for restoration of custody of the minor, and the minor 11was adjudicated neglected, abused, or dependent as a result of 12physical abuse, the court shall cause to be made an 13investigation as to whether the movant has ever been charged 14with or convicted of any criminal offense which would indicate 15the likelihood of any further physical abuse to the minor. 16Evidence of such criminal convictions shall be taken into 17account in determining whether the minor can be cared for at 18home without endangering the minor's health or safety and 19fitness of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian.20        (a) Any agency of this State or any subdivision 21    thereof shall cooperate with the agent of the court in 22    providing any information sought in the investigation.23        (b) The information derived from the investigation and 24    any conclusions or recommendations derived from the 25    information shall be provided to the parent, guardian, or 26    legal custodian seeking restoration of custody prior to   SB1504 Enrolled- 99 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    the hearing on fitness and the movant shall have an 2    opportunity at the hearing to refute the information or 3    contest its significance.4        (c) All information obtained from any investigation 5    shall be confidential as provided in Section 5-150 of this 6    Act.7(Source: P.A. 102-193, eff. 7-30-21; 102-489, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-154, eff. 96-30-23; 103-171, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1061, 10eff. 2-5-25.) 11    (705 ILCS 405/2-28.2 new)12    Sec. 2-28.2. Successful Transition to Adulthood Review 13hearings.14    (a) The court shall conduct Successful Transition to 15Adulthood Review (STAR) hearings to review the Department's 16efforts to ensure the minor is provided with opportunities to 17engage in individualized future-focused planning towards 18adulthood, to develop age-appropriate daily living skills to 19live successfully as an adult, and if applicable, to be 20prepared to transition out of the care of the Department at age 2121.22    (b) The court shall conduct a STAR hearing for all minors 23for whom the court has entered a permanency goal of 24independence and for all minors who are 17 years of age or 25older. The minor's first STAR hearing shall be conducted   SB1504 Enrolled- 100 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1within 6 months of the minor qualifying for a STAR hearing. 2Subsequent STAR hearings may be conducted contemporaneously 3with the minor's permanency hearing. At a minimum, the court 4shall conduct STAR hearings for eligible minors within 6 5months of the minor becoming eligible for a STAR hearing and 6annually thereafter. The court may schedule additional STAR 7hearings as necessary and in the minor's best interest.8    (c) Fourteen days in advance of the STAR hearing the 9Department shall provide the court with the youth's service 10plan that includes the following information:11        (1) a copy of the youth-driven transition plan 12    developed in accordance with Section 35.10 of the Children 13    and Family Services Act;14        (2) for youth 17 years of age and older, the ILO TLP 15    Quarterly Discharge Launch Plan, if applicable;16        (3) a description of the documents necessary for adult 17    living as provided in Section 35.10 of the Children and 18    Family Services Act that the minor has, the documents the 19    minor continues to need, and the Department's plan to 20    ensure the minor has such documents prior to case closure;21        (4) a description of the Department's efforts to 22    assist the youth in developing and maintaining connections 23    with supportive adults and a copy of the minor's Ongoing 24    Family Finding and Relative Engagement Plan developed in 25    accordance with Section 2-27.3; and26        (5) for youth who are likely to need a guardian as a   SB1504 Enrolled- 101 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    person with a disability, in accordance with Article XIa 2    of the Probate Act of 1975, a description of the 3    Department's efforts to obtain any necessary assessments.4    (d) At the STAR hearing the court shall:5        (1) review the Department's efforts to assist the 6    minor in developing and implementing an individualized 7    youth-driven plan to develop life skills that will lead to 8    successful adult living;9        (2) review the plan developed by the Department and 10    the minor to ensure that it is reasonably likely to ensure 11    the minor can live independent of supports from the 12    Department;13        (3) review the Department's efforts to assist the 14    minor in accomplishing the plan;15        (4) review the Department's efforts to ensure the 16    minor has documents necessary for adult living, as defined 17    in Section 35.10 of the Children and Family Services Act 18    prior to case closure;19        (5) review the Department's efforts to ensure that the 20    minor is aware of available supports and services 21    post-case closure and how to access such supports and 22    services; and23        (6) if applicable, review the Department's efforts to 24    obtain any needed assessments to determine whether the 25    youth may qualify for a guardian as a person with a 26    disability under Article XIa of the Probate Act of 1975.  SB1504 Enrolled- 102 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    If the court finds that the youth-driven transition plan 2for the minor is not in the minor's best interest or will not 3be reasonably likely to result in the development of life 4skills necessary for adult living, the court shall make 5specific factual findings supporting its findings and order 6the Department to develop a new plan with the minor consistent 7with the court's findings. If the court finds that the 8Department has failed to make reasonable efforts to (i) assist 9the minor in developing and accomplishing a youth-driven 10transition plan or (ii) obtain any necessary assessments for 11minors to determine whether the youth may qualify for a 12guardian as a person with a disability under Article XIa of the 13Probate Act of 1975, then the court shall make specific 14factual findings and may enter such orders it deems necessary 15to ensure that the minor is developing necessary life skills 16and, when appropriate, is prepared to successfully transition 17to adulthood. 18    (705 ILCS 405/2-33)19    Sec. 2-33. Supplemental petition to reinstate wardship. 20    (1) Any time prior to a minor's 18th birthday, pursuant to 21a supplemental petition filed under this Section, the court 22may reinstate wardship and open a previously closed case when:23        (a) wardship and guardianship under the Juvenile Court 24    Act of 1987 was vacated in conjunction with the 25    appointment of a private guardian under the Probate Act of   SB1504 Enrolled- 103 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    1975;2        (b) the minor is not presently a ward of the court 3    under Article II of this Act nor is there a petition for 4    adjudication of wardship pending on behalf of the minor; 5    and6        (c) it is in the minor's best interest that wardship 7    be reinstated.8    (2) Any time prior to a minor's 21st birthday, pursuant to 9a supplemental petition filed under this Section, the court 10may reinstate wardship and open a previously closed case when:11        (a) wardship and guardianship under this Act was 12    vacated pursuant to:13            (i) an order entered under subsection (2) of 14        Section 2-31 in the case of a minor over the age of 18;15            (ii) closure of a case under subsection (2) of 16        Section 2-31 in the case of a minor under the age of 18 17        who has been partially or completely emancipated in 18        accordance with the Emancipation of Minors Act; or19            (iii) an order entered under subsection (3) of 20        Section 2-31 based on the minor's attaining the age of 21        19 years before the effective date of this amendatory 22        Act of the 101st General Assembly;23        (b) the minor is not presently a ward of the court 24    under Article II of this Act nor is there a petition for 25    adjudication of wardship pending on behalf of the minor; 26    and  SB1504 Enrolled- 104 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (c) it is in the minor's best interest that wardship 2    be reinstated.3    (3) The supplemental petition must be filed in the same 4proceeding in which the original adjudication order was 5entered. Unless excused by court for good cause shown, the 6petitioner shall give notice of the time and place of the 7hearing on the supplemental petition, in person or by mail, to 8the minor, if the minor is 14 years of age or older, and to the 9parties to the juvenile court proceeding. Notice shall be 10provided at least 3 court days in advance of the hearing date.11    (3.5) Whenever a petition is filed to reinstate wardship 12pursuant to subsection (1), prior to granting the petition, 13the court may order the Department of Children and Family 14Services to assess the minor's current and proposed living 15arrangements and to provide ongoing monitoring of the health, 16safety, and best interest of the minor during the pendency of 17the petition to assist the court in making that determination. 18    (4) A minor who is the subject of a petition to reinstate 19wardship under this Section shall be provided with 20representation in accordance with Sections 1-5 and 2-17 of 21this Act.22    (5) Whenever a minor is committed to the Department of 23Children and Family Services for care and services following 24the reinstatement of wardship under this Section, the 25Department shall:26        (a) Within 30 days of such commitment, prepare and   SB1504 Enrolled- 105 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1    file with the court a case plan which complies with the 2    federal Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980 3    and is consistent with the health, safety and best 4    interests of the minor; and5        (b) Promptly refer the minor for such services as are 6    necessary and consistent with the minor's health, safety 7    and best interests. 8    (6) Whenever the court grants a petition to reinstate 9wardship under this Section, the court shall schedule the case 10for a permanency hearing in accordance with Section 2-28 and a 11Successful Transition to Adulthood Review hearing in 12accordance with Section 2-28.2, if applicable. 13(Source: P.A. 101-78, eff. 7-12-19; 102-489, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    (705 ILCS 405/5-745)15    Sec. 5-745. Court review. 16    (1) The court may require any legal custodian or guardian 17of the person appointed under this Act, including the 18Department of Juvenile Justice for youth committed under 19Section 5-750 of this Act, to report periodically to the court 20or may cite the legal custodian or guardian into court and 21require the legal custodian or guardian, or the legal 22custodian's or guardian's agency, to make a full and accurate 23report of the doings of the legal custodian, guardian, or 24agency on behalf of the minor, including efforts to secure 25post-release placement of the youth after release from the   SB1504 Enrolled- 106 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1Department's facilities. The legal custodian or guardian, 2within 10 days after the citation, shall make the report, 3either in writing verified by affidavit or orally under oath 4in open court, or otherwise as the court directs. Upon the 5hearing of the report the court may remove the legal custodian 6or guardian and appoint another in the legal custodian's or 7guardian's stead or restore the minor to the custody of the 8minor's parents or former guardian or legal custodian.9    (2) If the Department of Children and Family Services is 10appointed legal custodian or guardian of a minor under Section 115-740 of this Act, the Department of Children and Family 12Services shall file updated case plans with the court every 6 13months. Every agency which has guardianship of a child shall 14file a supplemental petition for court review, or review by an 15administrative body appointed or approved by the court and 16further order within 18 months of the sentencing order and 17each 18 months thereafter. The petition shall state facts 18relative to the child's present condition of physical, mental 19and emotional health as well as facts relative to the minor's 20present custodial or foster care. The petition shall be set 21for hearing and the clerk shall mail 10 days notice of the 22hearing by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the 23person or agency having the physical custody of the child, the 24minor and other interested parties unless a written waiver of 25notice is filed with the petition.26    If the minor is in the custody of the Illinois Department   SB1504 Enrolled- 107 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1of Children and Family Services, pursuant to an order entered 2under this Article, the court shall conduct permanency 3hearings as set out in subsections (1), (2), (2.3), (2.4), and 4(3) of Section 2-28 of Article II of this Act and Successful 5Transition to Adulthood Review hearings as set out in Section 62-28.2 of Article II of this Act. 7    Rights of wards of the court under this Act are 8enforceable against any public agency by complaints for relief 9by mandamus filed in any proceedings brought under this Act.10    (3) The minor or any person interested in the minor may 11apply to the court for a change in custody of the minor and the 12appointment of a new custodian or guardian of the person or for 13the restoration of the minor to the custody of the minor's 14parents or former guardian or custodian. In the event that the 15minor has attained 18 years of age and the guardian or 16custodian petitions the court for an order terminating the 17minor's guardianship or custody, guardianship or legal custody 18shall terminate automatically 30 days after the receipt of the 19petition unless the court orders otherwise. No legal custodian 20or guardian of the person may be removed without the legal 21custodian's or guardian's consent until given notice and an 22opportunity to be heard by the court.23    (4) If the minor is committed to the Department of 24Juvenile Justice under Section 5-750 of this Act, the 25Department shall notify the court in writing of the occurrence 26of any of the following:  SB1504 Enrolled- 108 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1        (a) a critical incident involving a youth committed to 2    the Department; as used in this paragraph (a), "critical 3    incident" means any incident that involves a serious risk 4    to the life, health, or well-being of the youth and 5    includes, but is not limited to, an accident or suicide 6    attempt resulting in serious bodily harm or 7    hospitalization, psychiatric hospitalization, alleged or 8    suspected abuse, or escape or attempted escape from 9    custody, filed within 10 days of the occurrence;10        (b) a youth who has been released by the Prisoner 11    Review Board but remains in a Department facility solely 12    because the youth does not have an approved aftercare 13    release host site, filed within 10 days of the occurrence;14        (c) a youth, except a youth who has been adjudicated a 15    habitual or violent juvenile offender under Section 5-815 16    or 5-820 of this Act or committed for first degree murder, 17    who has been held in a Department facility for over one 18    consecutive year; or19        (d) if a report has been filed under paragraph (c) of 20    this subsection, a supplemental report shall be filed 21    every 6 months thereafter.22The notification required by this subsection (4) shall contain 23a brief description of the incident or situation and a summary 24of the youth's current physical, mental, and emotional health 25and the actions the Department took in response to the 26incident or to identify an aftercare release host site, as   SB1504 Enrolled- 109 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1applicable. Upon receipt of the notification, the court may 2require the Department to make a full report under subsection 3(1) of this Section.4    (5) With respect to any report required to be filed with 5the court under this Section, the Independent Juvenile 6Ombudsperson shall provide a copy to the minor's court 7appointed guardian ad litem, if the Department has received 8written notice of the appointment, and to the minor's 9attorney, if the Department has received written notice of 10representation from the attorney. If the Department has a 11record that a guardian has been appointed for the minor and a 12record of the last known address of the minor's court 13appointed guardian, the Independent Juvenile Ombudsperson 14shall send a notice to the guardian that the report is 15available and will be provided by the Independent Juvenile 16Ombudsperson upon request. If the Department has no record 17regarding the appointment of a guardian for the minor, and the 18Department's records include the last known addresses of the 19minor's parents, the Independent Juvenile Ombudsperson shall 20send a notice to the parents that the report is available and 21will be provided by the Independent Juvenile Ombudsperson upon 22request.23(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-1061, eff. 2-5-25.) 24    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 25changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text   SB1504 Enrolled- 110 -LRB104 09130 KTG 19186 b1that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 2represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 3not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 4made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 5Public Act. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 72026.